3) make a new friend :/ BUT.. First you will have to send this to 10people..in the next 143 mins.when ur done press # and your crushes name will appear in big letters.This is so scary because it works! if u break this chain you will have problems with: love, luck and friends xx
08. Camarillo Brillo
REPORTER: Europe.
I screwed cup hooks into the top of the door (where the wood is thicker) to hang this "As Seen on TV' purse organizer I got suckered into buying at the local drugstore. It didn't fit in my diaper bag (for the kids, not for me), but works perfectly to store my hairdryer and brushes. You can even adjust the length of strings.
Are beds prepared for sleepers at night in the houses? no sleepers
I have the word "breathe" above the door to my patio. I often need the reminder...and the past few weeks I've needed it a lot. Where to begin?
Apocalypse now. Apocalypse then.
So. No secrets. I guess that it doesn’t count if I say that I was desperately, agonizingly reaching for sleep last night and that didn’t happen. I kept expecting…something.
“Well then,” I say cheerily, trying to lighten the mood. “Let’s go find some breakfast.” We split up and I pick some berries from the scraggly bushes growing in the rocks. Henry manages to find some mushrooms and two walnuts. Gypsy and Todd wait patiently while we dangle our feet over the edge and gobble down our meager breakfast. The fog is lifting and we can see for a few miles as the bottom of the ravine slowly climbs back up to meet the sky. My stomach still grumbles but I hand my walnut to Henry.
Churchill intervened: 'Question . is whether it is politically wise to allow public feeling to develop a little more before taking action.' Adding that it would be 'fatal' to let the situation develop too far Mr.Churchill conclud: 'Would like also to study possibility of "quota" - no. not to be exceeded.'
Cotton: 17.38 mg/lb, down 63% from its 2011 high, but still 30% higher than its 2009 low
“The calls were inconsistent so the kids didn’t know what they were going to be able to get away with,” Martin coach Armando Garcia said. “I think that kind of puts a question mark in the minds of the students. They really don’t know what to expect.”
“Ah well.”
Carrying the Dionysian cup of joy,
I’ll let you know how it goes.
Total weight gain/loss: Still 6 pounds this week.
Loving Stitches is a place to park for the afternoon/ morning, as the case may be....or all day if you prefer. They are definitely a full service quilt shop. You can find them at www.lovingstitches.net. Take a peek.
The second disaster happened on the way home. We were in the passing lane coming up to overtake an 18-wheeler, when Terry noticed that it was losing pieces of its tire.
I remember hearing a few years ago that there had at one time been a community of Mohawk Indians living in Boerum Hill and that various bars in the area bore names in reference to Native American culture, such as "The Wigwam," but I never knew any details about their presence here. Thankfully, Brooklynology has posted a great little history about this Brooklyn enclave of the past.
Simon sniggers and we get into the circle.
Justin and I both wanted to make sure to take as many pictures as possible and ask as many questions we could think of. We are both itching to get a place (in due time) we can beautify like this.
Islam, the blood thirsty and repressive ideology which has threatened Western Civilisation for fourteen hundred years is back in the ascendant after a period of relative calm, and it is as poisonous now as it ever was.
talent at the same time. It all culminates in the raga dedicated to John
It is the very fact of having to slow down, stop or rest that makes a city what it is. If the travelers and drivers don't stop, they won't spend money, and there is no reason for businesses to set up there. If there are no businesses, there are no jobs and thus no reason for anyone else to live there.
In a culture which, in many way, values quiet humility over pride, allowing yourself a moment or two to be proud of your accomplishments can be a very rare luxury. We are taught to focus on what could be better about ourselves, on all of the things we need to change, and on all of the things we do wrong that prevent us from being perfect. When we do something well, we are taught to be humble about it. Don't get me wrong, humble is good; but when humility and a desire to improve provide an obstacle to being able to see and appreciate your own goodness, not only does that hinder your own self-image and self-worth, it sets a potentially negative example for your children. Think about it; how will your kids ever be satisfied with the amazing things they do if they are not allowed to take pride in them, to celebrate what they are and what they do? I'm not saying that we should demonstrate cockiness, but there is something very relieving and rejuvenating about taking pride in a job well done.
A second passport can be that ticket out… safe passage for you and your family to a new place where the opportunities are better, safer, and brighter. It’s a scenario that no one can really imagine… but history shows that few people ever do.
i had this old footstool sitting around, and decided to go to town on it! it didn't necessarily turn out exactly as i would like, but it definitely put a modern spin on a classic, and i think it'll be a cool white addition to my home. plus, the sheen on the paint i used makes it ultra-shiny, which adds a lot to the originally traditional piece.
tons of greens in a huge
He walked toward the podium with slow and deliberate steps. Mara had seen the other speakers do the same thing, dreading the moment that all eyes would be on them. With Luke though, she knew his reason was different. Luke was holding on as long as he could to Kadie’s last good-bye. Dragging those moments out, allowed him a bit more time before he had to let her go.
Double up sessions with Capitol Debate until NJFL
Photographer: Kevin Kinisky
In another saucepan combine the cornstarch, sugar, salt and milk. Whisk until combined well. Place over medium heat , whisking constantly; bring to a boil and reduce; cook 2 minutes. In a separate bowl temper the egg yolks with the hot milk mixture; whisking as you add the hot milk mixture to the egg yolks. Pour the temper egg mixture into the saucepan of hot milk and whisk until combined. Place over heat and continue to cook and whisk for 2 more minutes. Stir in the pineapple mixture and heat for a minute longer. Remove from heat and stir in the butter and vanilla.
Mushrooms are very low in calories ( do they have any calories?), so they are a great food to eat when you are trying to lose a little weight.
Last night's episode of Sarah Palin's Alaska was an exercise in perspective. Move the lens even a bit, and I'm sure the picture would change. From Kate Gosselin's perspective, the afternoon of Fun 'n Campin' 'n Roughin' It With the Palins, Alaska-style, probably becomes a nightmarish affair of dampness and numbness and danger. The closest analogue I can come up with is the time James Joyce and Marcel Proust shared a taxi.
That summer, Aunty Ce and Uncle Pete had come over from Australia for one of their visits - there was always plenty of relative visiting to do in the UK as they'd lived here all their lives until the late 60's when they'd decided to take the Government initative and sail to Australia for £1.00. Or it could've been £50, the details get lost with the decades.
I'm sure readers can peruse through my two posts on my fantasy football teams and note the strengths and weaknesses of my logic/decisions. As for my teams, well, the team discussed in Part 2 (the keeper league, PPR team) has already won its game and is heading to its fantasy semi-finals. The other team ran into a bit of bad luck (and perhaps questionable decision-making on my part in who to start) when Demarco Murray was injured with only 3.1 fantasy points. I will need 53 yards from Brandon Lloyd tonight in order to move on to the semi-finals in that league. I don't hold out much hope of Lloyd accomplishing this task, but, referencing an old cliche, "One can always hope."
So if you want to support Magic Ship, why not send Jim an email - jimross@radiocaroline.co.uk – and request your favorite track off the album? He'd get a huge buzz out of hearing from you with your requests and dedications.
Yes, “problems,” and how, when, and where to line each others’ pockets to fund Islamist zealotry. Meanwhile, the U.K. continues to slumber while a pro-Wahhabi, Hamas-funding “charity” thrives within its borders.
But about Seven years ago, I started on my journey of recovery …
with other mama's...
Theo Boguszewski
Of course, I didn't decide that until after I had filled in the holes from the original pulls and sanded everything down. Then (much later) when I decided I didn't like it, I had Dax come drill out all the holes I had filled in. LOL Figures, right?
While it was very minor part to play, I still enjoyed it and learned from it. The guys were great. They treated me like one of them. And even though their humor is often off color, (no big surprise there!) I felt privileged that they did not act differently because I was there. They felt free to let of steam in their usual manner. That is very important to me, working with the fire buff battalion, knowing that the firefighters can be totally free to be themselves and not have to be mindful that what they say may be offensive to us or upsetting. This is a stressful job and they need to cope in any way that works for them.
Nothing shows the stats like a good old pie chart. Below is a breakdown of Chicago's racial make-up and the perpetrators of various crimes in the city. Have a good look. You'll notice that the 'red' slice overwhelms all the other colors on the wheel for various crimes and you'll never guess who is represented by the color red! Yes folks, when people say that Blacks are being unfairly labelled as criminals, don't believe it. As you can see below, there is no disputing who the problem is in communities. And before you wonder why, it's all down to their genetic make-up. They have lower IQ's, with impaired cognitive abilities - i.e. they don't have the ability to plan ahead or think of consequences to actions. These are the people who are out-breeding us, invading our countries and then voting for what's good for us! But, if you think Chicago is bad then please spare a thought for White South Africans. African-Americans have an IQ of 80, but Black sub-Saharan Africans have an IQ of 67 - which makes them officially morons. Wonder no more why sub-Saharan countries are dumps. When Blacks take over, regression occurs. You only have to think of Zimbabwe as an example - once a proud, food producing nation....now, a place where the Blacks scratch in the dirt for food....
One lucky winner will get to choose her favorite piece from the shop (up to $200). Which would you choose? See them all here.
I love the oatmeal aroma. Pure stunning. Held up incredibly well after a year’s worth of aging. Loads of chocolate and cream and oatmeal and rye on aroma. Some coffee too. Taste is oatmeal; cream, chocolate, good bitterness, stunning blending, balanced soo well, really great beer.
This victory can be credited in part to the major education reforms recently enacted by the New York State legislators. Yet, without the commitment of President Barack Obama and Education Secretary Arne Duncan in recognizing that New York State is worthy of these vital dollars, we would be without this essential investment for our children's future. This is truly great news for families across the state!
Of course.
Our daughter, Trinity, seemed to grow up a little while I was away. She says things like “actually” when correcting me. And, “perhaps” when suggesting an alternative way of doing something. She is delightful and I am so happy to spend so much time with her.
Happy Colouring!!!
Everything about this design says "sleek" and "fast" to me. Honestly, it gives me a little thrill every time I pull it out of my breast pocket. While it is certainly handsome and likely to get a reaction around a conference table crowded with Bic Stic users, the thrill I get is not from impressing others (I've sworn off pen snobbery, remember?), but from . . . well, it's a really cool pen accessory! Isn't that enough? (Besides, you'll only impress some people; the rest will think you're eccentric for even carrying your pens in a case, and they'll think you're absolutely insane when they find out what they cost. Or they'll just think you're trying to show off.)
small stone, day eighteen:
Now I need a liniment rub.
This one has a "princess" badge on it and internet searching suggests that these were imported into Australia from Japan, then rebadged and sold through various department stores.
STAMPS: C1359 Sweet Baby D
For nearly a decade, Sony has been a leader in digital photography beginning with the DSC-50 and its floppy disc storage to all-digital models such as the DSC-W350 which is capable of modes that, a few years ago, were reserved for high-end digital single-lens reflex cameras and the like. The Sony DSC-W350 camera includes many features one normally associates with cameras costing much more. The DSC-W350 features a 24mm wide-angle uses sharp Carl Zeiss optics.
The Cruddas Park housing scheme was part of T. Dan Smith's grand plan for a 'city in the sky'. Smith was from a working-class family in Wallsend and he became a visionary leader of Newcastle City Council. He wanted to make Newcastle a modern city and his vision included urban motorways, a metro public transport system and high profile architecture (all of which Newcastle now has). However, power corrupts and Smith got caught in a web of deceit and he ended up serving six years in jail. It has been alleged Smith took cash and other perks for awarding the Cruddas Park contracts.
As I resumed work this Saturday. At the lobby, I was welcomed by non-functioning elevators leading me to climb the stairs till seventh floor. Before the climb, I almost absented myself and headed home to get more sleep. But my load of work was on my mind, thus work prevailed. My heart beat went so fast that my heart seemed to explode. As I sat down and attended to my daily routine, three SMS churned out, two morning greetings from my babe and one from my former best friend.
to the black
When thinking about the movie, I really think that if it is done faithfully that the movie will suffer. The book never feels like it is totally invested in its tone and is more concerned with the inner monologues of our main character. I just don’t see the movie adapting the intense and lengthy inner thoughts of Katniss. For the film to work the film has to tone down the source material. People may hate this but some things don’t transfer well from book to screen. The movie should be focused on the realistic qualities of the game. I just don’t see the climax going well if the movie indulges in it too much. It will break the tone and make the feature lose a lot of its teeth. The cool thing about the game is how the reader can relate to the realism of it all. Too much fantasy, I feel, will disrupt the best thing about the novel. The idea that we could live in a world where blood, sweat, and a closed mouth is the national currency for survival.
Our trip south from Grandview, MO landed us in Rich Hill, MO. I know of this town well, as it is where my grandfather grew up and who still owns a large farm. It has probably been about 15 years since I've last visited.
It's pointless, I suppose, to try to make sense of what the powers-that-be are up to; it simply makes no logical sense unless you try to see through the distorting lens of the multicultists.
It now seems, at least in the consumer dystopia of England 2011, it is not merely intellectual property that has come adrift from its moral roots since the same fate has befallen physical property, both real and personal. Stealing an expensive and desirable pair of branded sports shoes is not just a question of taking possession of chattels without legal justification: it is a statement that one has bought into the aspirations which the brand conveys to those who wear it and that, as such an aspirant, one has a greater right to the shoes than does, for example, the inherently non-aspirational limited liability company which owns it. To put it another way, in terms of the aspirationally magnetic call of one leading brand owner, if you are a “Just do it” sort of person, you just do it.
Update on ROW80--I lost sight of my goals for a few days. I could use the excuse of a laundry crisis, but I won't. I'm spending the day chatting with a crit partner, and getting back on track. How are you doing with your goals?
If you wonder how to win in online casinos, you may have to realize many things related with online casinos. The foremost thing you have to know and realize is about availability of many people--not only you--to be able to play online Casino in very easy and simple way. This means that you may meet with every people from all over the world who are willing to play online Casino as like you. People you meet in online Casino may have higher ability or experience than you at playing Casino, so that you have to use such smart strategy for dealing with this condition. Moreover, the larger availability of Casinos for mobiles enables every one using supporting device to use and enjoy the new feature can increase the number of online Casino players. These all features are supported by high amount of payback, prize, or bonus available for those who win the game, so that Casino lovers number increase day by day. For this such heavy competition, you need valid and valuable information about online Casino which can guide you before or during playing the game many people like and idolize it.
Well Love Bug is only 6 so we are just starting to do chores. Right now when I was the load of towels, if she folds them she gets .50. And that's it. But this summer, while she is home, she is going to be doing more chores, and we will do an allowance for her.
I have to admitt, I am chuckling! Obvioulsy today’s post is about Naikan, a method of self-reflection. In preparing to wirte, I was searching for other blogs and sites that mention Naikan. To my suprise, up popped The Huffington Post, and an article written just a few days ago. Back in the late 70′s friends used to mavel at the miracle of synchronicity: “Synchronicity is the experience of two or more events that are apparently causally unrelated or unlikely to occur together by chance and that are observed to occur together in a meaningful manner.” HuffPo and my brain.
When the big day arrives Billy and Donna chose to dress appropriately for both seduction and the heat of the July 4th weekend. Billy in a black turtle-neck, short-sleeve shirt and Donna in a pair of skin-tight green pants and a belly shirt.
How honored and magnified is mankind through the Holy Virgin Mother of God, for it has been made worthy of renewal and sonship by God.
“Well, that was rather unpleasant but thankfully not a complete waste of time.”
But Obama fails to mention that Dems created the mess:
$45 for Professionals, three or more persons from the same organization discounted at $25 per person
If I am asked who to blame for the debacle I would say that we were all – from the common man in the street to the highest person in the office, equally responsible for it. The common man for committing the sin of keeping himself ignorant of the under currents simmering there ever since that fateful 19th day of March 1948 when Quaid raising his admonishing finger to the Bengali students at the Dacca University convocation had warned them that Urdu will be the only official state language of Pakistan, and not trying to assess the anguish caused to the Bengalis and take measures to bring any rapprochement.
Hi CJ Family!
We pried the lid off a water main and there they were ...
The Legend Hunters . . .
I wanna be loved by you
Eventually, the CD made its way to the entertainment center cabinet. The toy, an extremely annoying toy, made it to the basement. (I’ve kept it for sentimental reasons.) And the book, well, I kept it out for my 9-year-old son, who had read it a few years back but is rarely sick, and maybe he would want to read it again sometime soon. So here’s this really old book just jumping around the house for the last two months…
To investigate this, the Government commissioned a specialist in risk management – a Professor Lofstedt – to report on putting ‘the common sense back into health and safety’. His conclusions largely supported the status quo, his general observation on health and safety being that ‘the problem lies less with the regulations themselves, and more with the way they are interpreted and applied.’
Still in school full time.
This booth smells like plastic because all the art is plastic. This booth is playing smooth jazz on a boombox to go with the art.
After several years of posting nearly every single day, I still haven't tried a single reader's poll. The primary reason: I think polls are just a lame waste of time.... but, I must say I can't help but try it at least once.
I can honestly say that my house in NE Minneapolis used to be exactly where my neighbors Chicken coop used to be around 65 years ago. Back in the day my neighbor Bill used to live on his parents farm in the city, on the outskirts of Minneapolis near St. Anthony. These chickens must have had a shifty eye towards the progress and expansion of this city when house's were being build up around their farm 60 years ago. Not sure what else went down on Bill's farm, but I do know that I'm brewin beer where those cluckers used to roost.
For example, the GPS device can prove that a driver did not make a stop in a case where they are accused of pulling over and committing abuse. If the data is collected from the GPS device and it shows the driver continued from point A to point B without making an unscheduled stop, the case can be immediately thrown out. It negates the dreaded “he said-she said” argument by providing cold, hard GPS coordinate facts.
My favorite so far has to be this decor from Pam over at Simple Details. Fresh, clean and easy, done with items on hand like red and white books, gold and brass pieces and white pottery. Sprinkled with a few holiday items and some natural elements, this vignette is just lovely.
Actions are less important, ultimately, than their perception. What happened is not as powerful as the story of what happened.
Somebody whispered in Ernie’s ear and then he came over to Ronnie and said –“that’s Nazareth, you know them guys. They did that heavy metal lullaby - Love Hurts.” Ronnie replied – “shit, that’s them? - they took that old Everly Brothers song and nailed that one too.” Ernie was getting worked up now. “What’s so special ’bout a man in leather singin’ sweet.” Ronnie looked over the top of his shades and softly slapped Ernie. “What the hell you think we did with Seals & Crofts Summer Breeze? It worked musically, financially and the women go crazy. We turned that baby inside out so much all them people bought it a second time from us because they couldn’t recognize it.” Nazareth’s manager walked up to the group and told the band the Isley Brothers were in the room. Dan walked over to Ronnie and shook his hand. “I love your band, and I love your voice.” Ronnie just smiled and said – “our turn.”
i wrote the following FB note new years eve 2008. thankfully this day doesn’t come with the melancholy that most new years eves bring for me, as i just ended a much needed visit with fab friends this week. but the concept remains. fresh starts are so refreshing. and God ordained. happy new year to you…more than that, may your new year be filled with more giving, more loving, and more seeking our great God of new beginnings.
Today is officially Earth Day around the world.
Uzhorod, Carpathian Region of Soviet Ukraine"
I was ,let’s say, whatever nature made me with an expressive smile.I became quite skinny with a lifeless smile.
Chabon’s editorial premise was simple: a lot of great fiction falls under the lowbrow category “genre.” That includes science fiction, horror, mystery, what folks called “pulp fiction” back in the thirties. “Pulp” because of the grade of paper the magazines were printed on, the cheapest possible, made from wood pulp.
Cover Photo: Scott Hamilton / Cover Design: Brett Cross
Preheat your broiler.
Maharaj Ji is still telling people that they can have peace through his meditation, but take it from me, it’s nothing more than New Age, phony baloney. There is only one Prince of Peace and it certainly isn’t this guy.
Hope you guys are doing well, we're just finalizing all the little details for the wedding (22 days!!) and staying busy - as always.
A: It was serendipity. Several years back, Stephen King was packing for a book tour to the UK. Looking for a novel to read on his flight, he opened a box of books his British publisher had sent him. He pulled out CHINA LAKE. I wish I could say he read the first paragraph and felt overwhelmed by the prose. But he decided that the print was large enough for comfortable reading on a long flight. So he took the book along. And by the time he landed in London, he'd finished it. He asked our British publisher who published me in America. The answer was nobody. For me, at the time, this was hugely frustrating. After all, I'm a Californian. I happened to be living in London because my husband's job had been transferred there. And I was excited that a British publisher was putting out the Evan Delaney series. But as an American, I keenly wanted to be published in my own country. However, after five books in the series, and translation into a number of foreign languages, American publishers had said no to all of my novels. Over and over. And over.
The flower images come from a new stamp set called Raining Flowers. Do you think it's possible to have too many flower stamps? I don't! ;) These are two-step images and I used combos of Pretty in Pink/Regal Rose, Poppy Parade/Cherry Cobbler and Old Olive/Always Artichoke. The flower centers are poppy glimmer brads and pink buttons threaded with embroidery floss. To create the window I just punched openings with a 1 1/4" square punch, and for the box I used a panel of Early Espresso card stock scored on the edges so it would stand up from the card. Both the window and box were stamped with the wood grain background and sponged on the edges, which I hope you can see if you click on the photo! I decided to leave a lot of white space to really let the flowers shine on this card. The final touch was this fun sentiment from one of my favorite new sentiment sets, Friendly Phrases.
Michelle Herman Goldstein, 31, New York, N.Y.
I often say I'm a hippie, which isn't really a word with a clear definition, but when I use it it basically just means that I'm a radical, tree-hugging, non-shaving, organic-farm-loving person who sometimes likes to wear tie-dye.
So in the fall we cleaned out the weed patch and my dad gave us a huge sack of tulip bulbs. We figured one season of pretty flowers might make her happy.
Jesus stares up through watery eyes, "why don't you fcuk off, its harder than it looks, ah fcuk I think Judas saw you chopping Issac we'd better get this body moved or the Romans will be round FCUK THIS HURTS!!!!"
santa is wondering what on earth he has gotten into.
Click here to see some photos of our journey from Kenai to Dawson City, and stay tuned for more about Leaving Alaska!
With a stain.
Then, and only then, may you permeate the silence and join in with a rousing chorus of “HIYA! You’re back! Woo! Shall we get the internet sorted and buy a telly? Yeah. I’ll get the wine in."
The recipes I committed to trying this week are below. I have to keep them listed on my fridge or I'll forget what I was going to make. I might be losing my mind, or I'm the mother of a toddler, because I can't remember anything these days if I don't write it down. Do you experience this??
I purchased the new edition of the Writer's Tale, a 700-plus tome, composed of correspondance between writer Russell T Davies and Doctor Who journalist Benjamin Cook. What a book! It really is freaking comprehensive... For example, I've learned that the Series 4 companion came perilously close to being Penny Carter, not Donna Noble! Who knew? And, if you want to hear the words Doctor Who and Primeval uttered in the same sentence, The Writer's Tale is the place to go. RTD is a fan of Primeval! This has shot him even higher in my estimation.
I have missed blogging and have been working in the craft room, but havent been taking pics (bad blogger! shame on me!) but I intend on posting some updated pics soon!
Luckily, not everything in life is this complicated. There are many things in life that may not change. For example our taste in music, movies or even comfort food. I still love and probably always will; the Beatles, Elvis, scary movies, and ice cream.
2) The Ramones -- Leave Home: S/T FTW BUT OF COURSE
After I left work I stopped by the store and got her the dress she had her eye on I thought I would surprise her as well display I appreciated her as my wife as well show my thankfulness that she was okay with my little time at home due to my extra work hours since we were newlyweds… Like many other times when I would arrive home she would be sleeping and when I left for work she was sleeping due to her work hours so I figured she would be sleeping and I would surprise her after she woke up with the new dress… Little did I know my faith with God was going to become shaken as well my heart crushed again, The reason I say this is because when I got home I open the bedroom door to slip the dress into the closet but I was stricken an stopped dead in my tracks due to the Fact as I open the door to walked into the bedroom I was greeted with the fact that my wife, was in bed with my friend…
I added 1/4cp more nuts on the bottom layer because I like nuts .
Lack of access to appropriate opportunities is an issue of power, (Melkote and Steeves, 2001). For Rappaport (1987), effective social change processes mean that researchers and practitioners have to address problems of unequal power relations. According to Wilkins (2001: 1), ‘to reshape the field of development communication we must situate its discourse and practice within the context of power’. Melkote and Steeves (2001: 36) argue that empowerment cannot be understood without first defining power, since real change may not be possible unless we address power inequalities between marginalised individuals and groups at the grassroots and those who make policy decisions. Craig and Mayo contend that political power in capitalist societies cannot be separated from economic power. Further to this, White (2004: 14) points out that “the effect of the poor communities to pull themselves up would encompass a redefinition not only of the political system but also economic, social and cultural practices that might engender a democratic ordering for society as a whole”. Community empowerment can therefore lead to social movements that may challenge existing political power structures.
I incubated using my new Genesis 1588 with a digital thermometer because it is so easy to adjust the temperature and moved the eggs to the older Genesis for lockdown. By using the new incubator only for incubation, the small feathers and other debris of hatch will not become imbedded in the stryofoam or get stuck in the fan, and this will extend its life. The older Genesis is being used as a hatcher. You can read more about lockdown and incubation in my incubation guide.
As if that was not enough, the latest (and late) party accounts show that the true party debt was in excess of £800,000—despite Griffin lying through his teeth to the members during the leadership election that the claims of these debts were “lies” (remember the “Mythbusters” leaflet, which, under the heading “DEBTS—IN REALITY” said that “TOTAL AGREED CENTRAL PARTY PAYMENTS OWED—£52,000).”
If after all this you still want white all that's left to do is choose the perfect one :)
The best way to find an aromatherapist is through personal recommendations. You may want to consider asking family and friends for a referral if they have used an aromatherapist in the past. Your goal is to find the specialist that you trust, who is qualified, and who is reliable.
In case you don’t already know, “CC” on an email means “carbon copy”, and “BCC” means “blind carbon copy.” They have old timey roots, but the abbreviations have stuck around. In modern vernacular, when someone says “copy me on it”, they mean CC them on that email, or, make sure they see the email, even though its contents aren’t directly addressed to them. The difference with BCC is that the recipient(s) can’t see who else is getting the email. It’s very sneaky, it’s a lovely little tool for when you’re sending something to a large list of people who may not want their emails shared, as is often the case with a press release. If you use Gmail, like I do, click ‘Add CC” or ‘Add BCC’ under the send box to get these options. (Also, you can email from different accounts via gmail! Incredibly handy! If you also download the Gmail app on your smartphone, you can use this option there, too.)
Let us break this down into words simpler. Let us say that all of you have used the term Mother Nature in your conversations, and have heard it called such all your life. Whether or not it has encouraged you to view Mother Nature as a symbol or as a living, evolving being. We encourage you now to think of Mother Nature the same entity that is referred to as Mother Earth. We also want you to think of the entity Father Sky. We would say that, for the moment, we ask you to consider Father Nature and Father Sky as one and the same. It is Father Nature who perpetuates the lives that Mother Nature gives birth to. Think about that sentence. It is a very important sentence. Just as easy as it is for you to think of Mother Nature as an entity that goes beyond thinking of her as a purely mythological figure. Let’s apply this to the concept that Mother Nature is composed of the Four Seasons. The seasons are the result of various dynamic forces, including the earth revolving on its axis and its placement in the solar system, and many other factors. It does not matter what Mother Nature gives life to, that life must be perpetuated. It must be nourished with life force, for without life force, no life in any form can or would exist. We want you to think of the seasons as being masculine and feminine in their nature, for this is a basic way to define and, hopefully, to proffer a clearer understanding of what we are trying to say. Dividing the seasons into masculine and feminine does not mean that we are, in any shape or form alluding to “gender” as one might think of the gender of a human being and members of any kingdom of life. Rather, we are thinking of the pure energy that is generated by each season. That generator is a living form or being. The season of winter is masculine, the spring is feminine, the summer is masculine, and the autumn is feminine. In fact, autumn is the most feminine of all four of the seasons. Summer is masculine due to its close relationship with Father Sky, and thus its relationship with Father Sun. Solar energy is life force. Thus, the dynamic “being” that is summer is a tremendous source of life force and power for all of the lives that exist on Earth. When an entity is perceived to exist, then the next intellectual step is to give a name to the four entities. If you deem that this is appropriate and adds to your understanding of the seasons, then by all means do so. I, Albion, suggest that winter is the name; summer is the name, and so forth. These are the age-old names of the Four Seasons.
Song directs children to violence and Martyrdom-death Nazi Pallywood 1938 And Fake Italian Charity Workers The Hoopsters Who Jumped Through Hoops My responses to the BBC panelists on the possible bombing of Iran Song directs children to violence and Martyrdom-death Gazprom to join Mediterranean energy hunt? The Middle East Sampler 3/5/2012: Palestinian TV
My next post will be about “Eveline” and “After the Race,” the stories about adolescence; and “Two Gallants” and “The Boarding House,” two of the six stories that deal with “maturity.”
1 bridge
Bridal salons will generally buy select pieces of a collection, not the complete one. Find out if your local salon is having a trunk show for the designer of the dress you're interested in.
Reputed healing shrines in India attract visitors with the common belief that mental ailments are caused by sorcery or bad spirits. This explanation is generally accepted and it avoids the negative stigma associated with mental illness. Attendance at a shrine allows the potent power of the shrine’s resident deity to overcome the evil spirit within the afflicted person. The denomination of the shrine does not matter—cure seekers of different religions will visit well-known Hindu, Sufi Muslim or Catholic healing shrines.
I know that baby can hear it! I feel him moving around while the music is playing. I also know when he doesn't like a particular song, he will send me hard kicks and I know its time to remove that song from the line up.
(January 23, 2010)
Serve Him Whole-Heartedly
To finish off, we had a roasted rice ball with cod-roe inside. This was also really excellent.The big plump grains of pearl rice round the outside a nice golden colour and deliciously cirspy, while the rice around the roe stayed soft and perfectly cooked.
Interestingly, that percentage was comprised of 41 percent who were actively searching for a new job (i.e., those who were going on interviews and potentially ready to leave the organisation) and 35 percent who were passively job searching (i.e., those who had posted resumes online or were browsing job postings, but were not yet certain they wanted to leave).
“I—“ The boy knew he’d broken the rules. He lowered his eyes but protested, “He called me ‘Gypsy.’ I don’t think he meant it nice.”
Guillermo died when fighting alongside his uncle in the battle of La Hogaza in 1817. Benigna Palacios y Bolívar married Pedro Amestoy. Their great-grandchildren, Pedro (94) and Eduardo (90) Mendoza-Goiticoa live in Caracas. They are Simón Bolívar’s closest living relatives.
Put simply, I doubt my years in governance will have a huge impact on immigration levels. Good luck.
I could not leave my bed yesterday until I had finished this wonderful novel. That often happens to me when I get gripped by a tale, especially one with such neat, short sections, where it is impossible not to move on to the next! Today I found myself flicking through the book again, savouring some of the more beautiful passages, reminding myself of events and characters that moved me. Xas is so beautifully described, curious about and becoming lost in a world he does not truly understand, and emotions he could not possibly expect. Sobran is so painfully human, capable of overwhelming emotion, and of making all too credible mistakes. And do not let us forget the women in this story, the passionate and possible insane Celeste, and the intelligent and courageous Aurora.
2) We can get to said hospital in about 35 minutes when abiding by most traffic laws.
We totally forget on the “IMPERMANENCE OF LIFE”.
Size: 17,482 acres
I'm not sure what I'm saying - these posts are often first drafts of ideas - and I've conflated a couple here, without quite getting to the heart of either. The wondering where superstition will exist in an age where things become increasingly virtual (does the artefact become more important? Or do libraries become as empty as the church of an ancient sect?) - and the role of over-production of art in a culture that needs the over-production more than it needs the art?
Bill legged it to the airport and thought “Well this is it”
In these pages I have endeavoured to...scatter some suggestions that may tend to elevate the tone of public life, ascertain the the true character of political parties, and induce us for the future more carefully to distinguish between facts, phrases, realities and phantoms...
Cork Alpha - Target $1 bin
article about my good friend, Rose Hicks.
There are the obvious things that are made more difficult when you’re carrying an extra person on your back (and legs, and stomach, and arms …), like finding clothes that fit or traveling by plane or walking long distances or climbing the Great Wall of China (yeah, I did that).
And liberal comics won’t like it
Funding sources:
Now here is the hardest part of the requirements...picking the blogs to pass the award on to!
When Patty and I got to the shoe store, we realized that we hadn't given any thought to the fact that it was a Sunday evening, and sure enough, the store closes early. We had maybe 20 minutes to look at the shoes. This was plenty of time for me, and Patty agreed, she already knew which shoes she was coming for, and just needed to try them on. I left her to her own devices, and when it was time for the store to close, I went in search of her. I found her trying on sandals. She was going down the aisle that had her size, and insisted on trying on every single pair in the store. The cashier kept asking customers to "make their final selection", or in other words, since we were the ONLY two people left in the store, she really meant, "Hey you two fat bitches, I want to get the fuck up out of this joint, so check out NOW." It was 20 minutes after the store closed before I got her to take her shoes up to the counter.
Nothing else.
How do you know who your true friends are? Can someone be a loyal friend to you while staying friends with others who have hurt you or treated you like trash? Is it possible to remain truly neutral to both sides, or does someone have to play both sides to appear to be loyal to you?
“Why are you treating me like a Paki,” The Telegraph quoted Hassan Butt, 29, as saying to officers, who were “acting like the Gestapo.”
world music. (He plays 'fujare' and Tibetan singing bowls on "Lily",
Israel Crosby (bass)
As far as my top three French Beers:
Welcome to the final day of the Papertrey Ink Countdown and the second group post day. This time around we bring you Super Stars, designed by Nichole Heady, a truly super set! Each of us has picked an inspiration piece via Pinterest. Here's what I chose to work with...This gorgeous Anthropology window display inspiration piece can be found here. Anyone else as crazy about Anthropology as I am? Love that store! Anyways, I was inspired by the bright and bold color combo of the square and rectangle pieces. I interpreted them into a color combo of Raspberry Fizz, Summer Sunrise and Hawaiian Shores. I began this card by stamping the sentiment in True Black and the dotted flourish in Summer Sunrise.I then stamped the large star three times (using Raspberry Fizz, Summer Sunrise and Hawaiian Shores inks), trimmed, layered the stars together with dimensional adhesive and attached to the card base. Just A Note: I trimmed the card base to 5" x 3 1/2" to accommodate the star hanging over the edge.
Due to the sensitive nature of the abuse allegations, which form the core of this report, many steps were taken to assure the anonymity of alleged victims and priests who were the subjects of the study. The study used a double-blind procedure in which all reports were first sent to Ernst & Young, an accounting firm, where they were stripped of information that could be used to identify the area from which they were sent. Ernst & Young then sent the unopened envelopes containing survey responses to the John Jay researchers. The data set is thus stripped of all identifying information that may be linked to an individual diocese, eparchy or religious community, priest or victim.
And the whole beach was filled with these ppl. I mean, I’m really okay with the ones that comes to the beach to play. But sooo not okay if they do nonsense like this!
kx59: " I hadn't planned on it, no"
* 2 tbsp cayenne pepper
While researching Jim Stuckey’s interview, I saw that the opposition to the Atlantic Yards project was fierce and constant. I read Stuckey a laundry list of the major complaints: the project is too big; it will bring too many people to the area; there isn’t enough low-income housing in the project; the character of Downtown Brooklyn will change too dramatically; the area will become too much like Manhattan; Bruce Ratner will make too much profit; the project tears down too many landmarks; the public schools will become too crowded; Ratner has tricked everyone using sleight of hand; the tax giveaways are too great; the centerpiece of the project, Frank Gehry’s sixty-five-story building, is ugly; the residents were never consulted; blacks will we driven out of central Brooklyn; who wants a basketball team anyway?; and finally, the only reason Ratner is doing this is for the money. I could hear Stuckey let out a long sigh when my recitation was completed.
do you think im less attractive?
Had a little trouble getting into the swing of things again though.
This is exactly what hardcore was meant to sound like in the 1980's. Don't be fooled by the bands other records though.. they just don't compare, not even by 50%.
Note: Please do not park on the North Loop strip.
We began with a brisk walk through the history of pale lagers with Shandy entertaining and informing the hushed crowd who hung on his every word. They may have just been leaning forward in an attempt to understand his accent – not sure. The Tech-Foul bell was back – this time a real, actual bell, in case anyone got too ‘beer nerdy’ or poindexter-y during the night.
I also keep reminding myself that people want to quit when they are closest to reaching their goal. Let’s keep trucking and keep putting both feet forward. You never know what your incredible is that awaits you!
Even if Saturn 3 has aged pretty badly it’s a movie that’s close to my heart. It’s big budget trash, but with a story who belongs in a seventies porn-parody. Kirk Douglas is of course great, but there’s an air of desperation around him – like he knows that he’s an old fart and that this won’t work out in the end. I think this is the last time I’ve seen him play young-at-heart macho guys, after that he understood his age and took more fitting parts. The aura of not so hip sex oozes from Saturn 3, but never becomes annoying or too adult. The violence is more graphic, which surprised me after all these years – for example a chopped of hand, a character being sliced to thousands of pieces and a quick look at a robot wearing a human head!
I also purchased a laptop so I have spent quite a bit of time learning how to use the touch pad, which basically means learning how to undo something that I had no clue I was doing, and learning Windows 7.
the ambassador of popularity.
D xo
6 Hotho, S. (1999) Motivation in an ab initio German classroom, Language Learning Journal 20:1, 37-44
What would complete YOU?
Sorry, but it’s hard to watch a man’s face so tightly strung that his eyebrows, eyelids and cheek muscles don’t move while he sings. It’s just as hard to watch The Temptations attempt choreography they havent rehearsed, or Martha Reeve scream and convulse her way through old hits.
the reasons we died,
My sister is set to close on her house and be moved out by the 30th of December. I am really going to miss having them just down the road from me and I am sure Kam will miss going over there everyday. He did tell me that he is excited to go visit them when they leave though. Looks like we will be vacationing in Boise this next year. I am hoping to find him a daycare that combines preschool into it so he can have a jump start on reading and all that good stuff. He told me the other day that he really wants to be a doctor. When I asked him what kind he replied "The kind that gives shots to kids when they are sick." I fully intend on doing everything I can to promote this kind of thinking and so preschool here we come!
Ford: he has 30 days to refrain from blaming
Parents and friends, remember you can NOT put the idea of suicide into someone’s head, so if you think your child or friend is suffering or needs help, ASK and ask directly! “Are you thinking about hurting yourself or suicide?”
Your word is birth
and room for a personal note.
I love my Savior because Dad loved Him first. I don't know if my Dad will every understand what his example and testimony has done for me. I charish those times I heard him bare his testimony of the Savior while he was bishop. I've seen the Atonement work in his life as he's let the Savior mold him into the man he is today.
Everyone ask’s us “Why do you want to move to Portland?” Some people are asking this in a curious way, just wondering what draws us there, but others ask in a guilting way, somehow attempting to imply that us moving away is just a way to hurt them. In fact the guilting way happens more than anything, and I’ve come to the point where I’m constantly defending my decision. I’ve now decided that I really don’t need to do that. To quote Ben Folds ‘Adelaide’, “Because I want to.” should be a good enough answer. Its still a somewhat free country right?
We spoke of the camera and its main accessories, but the most important thing in photography is the light, the word photography itself derive by the union of two greek words phos (light) and graphis (write), so it literally means, "write with light"... READ MORE
FACT: It can't be counted on as a last resort, because sometimes it doesn't bring about the desired result. Then there has to be something else to resort to after it.
For simpletons turn away from me—to death. Fools are destroyed by their own complacency. But all who listen to me will live in peace, untroubled by fear of harm.”
Music: Adam Geibel
Take the Marais, the Latin Quarter, Montmartre in Paris, so many parts of London, Rome, NY’s W. Village or the Meatpacking District, Copenhagen’s Medieval quarter — great cities, alive, conjuring a sense, an experience, of history. You walk it, see it, feel it. Same with the Middle East’s walled medinas — Jerusalem and Cairo, Aleppo and Damascus, Fez and Marrakesh.
He pulled the mouse by its tail from the woman's top before lowering it into his mouth.
Also, if you are new to cooking quinoa you use 2 cups of water or broth for every 1 cup of quinoa. It is suggested that you rinse and drain the quinoa before using it but before it is cooked it is VERY small and slips through a strainer. Make sure you use a very fine mesh sieve. Bring water and quinoa to a boil and then reduce heat to a simmer. Cook, covered for 15 minutes or until all water has been absorbed and you can see a small "thread" on the quinoa. Remember that quinoa expands to about 4x its size when you cook it so 1 cup dry will yield 4 cups cooked.
The main ingredients are:
There it is,,, I said it.
(** Yes I know it’s often more complicated than that. For example, many of our international PhDs have a job to go back to before they even join us in the first year. However, we can factor that in, and figure out if we need to do further surveys to tease out some of the nuances for particular groups.)
The answer came to me whilst drinking 3 bottles of The Kernel. It's The Kernel.
In Birmingham and London trainees were instructed in hand-to-hand combat and survival skills. They were sent for further military training in Yemen and Afghanistan. After the London bombings, The Times reported that “a dozen members” of Al-Muhajiroun “have taken part in suicide bombings or have become close to Al-Qaeda and its support network.” He was protected here for 20 years.
Spellbinders: Labels 3 (S4-189) # 6
It is so unjust that the enemies of Jesus Christ can foist their evil beliefs upon the faithful and in so doing; persecute those who dare to breathe a word of testimony concerning the work of the cross. It must be remembered that we, as Christians, are in enemy territory for Satan is the god of this world. He will do all he can, in whatever way possible, to make all men embrace the mystery of iniquity.
That reminded me of some literary scams which pass themselves off as legitimate. Fake agents may take kickbacks from vanity presses to make it appear that they have sales, or they claim to have “worked with” commercial publishers. Many vanity presses will say they’re not by any means vanity presses – they’re co-publishers, subsidy publishers, traditional publishers, etc.
After I finished the initial “hang” of Malynda’s work, I came home, got a well-deserved glass of wine, and started typing. Labels, price lists, bio, statement. Most of it was complete, but just needed some updating.
We have been busy, busy, busy around here lately with LOTS of family and FUN! Our visitors started arriving last weekend when my mom and Grandma Lois came to stay with us from Friday until Sunday. We celebrated my mom's birthday and had a relaxing weekend catching up and visiting.
Thinking Cathy was brought over for a threesome, I started to caress her ample breasts and push her bra away to reveal her purplish, large nipples. Once I started to suck on Cathy’s nipples, however, Shane jumped up and punched me directly in the dick. It was a full blown right cross to the dickus. I was dangerously injured, and confused.
It feels like the last few weeks have been a whirlwind, and after all of the build up I'm kind of looking around, confused, wondering where a) Christmas went; b) December went; and c) 2011 went. Even more overwhelming are ALL OF THE PLANS/IDEAS/GOALS I've started to make for myself for this upcoming year of 2012. (Sidenote: I think I've blogged this before, but does anyone else out there ever read something with a date of like... 1999 and think "Psh, that was just a few years ago... oh, um... or thirteen. A child has become a teenager and my mind still thinks it was just a few years ago." Also devastating-- hearing some of your favorite songs start to make the rounds on a radio station's Wayback Wednesday playlist.)
I have always know that work is the key to a good life. When I was younger, I watched as my parents worked their whole lives. As I matured, I took on their work ethic but I left out an important part of the equation - working in my own home. The older I got, the further I moved away from the notion that being at home is the major part of everyday renewal and that home is where we rest and regain the strength to deal with the stresses of the outside world. Our homes must be far more than just the place we store our clothes and sleep in every night. Turning the shell of a house into something much more and doing the house work that every home requires, may very well be the making of you too. I know now that making a warm and comfortable nest for my family and me was as beneficial and important as any of the paid work I ever did.
Another doctor responded, “Yes, he is going to present in a couple of weeks!”
When you exercise you release Endorphins. Sign up for a Kickboxing Class… or something physical like that. This will allow you to kick and punch a bag instead of you wanting to kick someone’s face… all this while you’re also getting a complete cardiovascular workout.
(King, looking livid, thrusts the sword just inches away from Anwaar’s neck.)
“As to the Dark Cemetery grave dirt,” said Riva. “That’s not an herb.”
Another benefit from this approach is that I have to believe it’s much easier for a head coach to provide an honest assessment of the ten best teams in the country than to sit down and try to rank the top 25 in order. That should also increase the accuracy of the results in that they’re more likely to come directly from the coaches than from a surrogate.
So, while the “Thin” installment was dominated by blondes, our “Medium Well Done” installment is nicely representative – we have blondes, redheads, and brunettes. Once again, credit must go to the hard-working makeup artists who did an amazing job of making the most of these admittedly already amazing faces.
But weddings are not about the mating ritual or the idea of life partnership; I hear you gasp, ‘they’re not?’. Nope they’re not. Marriage is, for most folk, about the wedding, the “big day”. Here’s a scenario: a guy usually proposes to a girl. Now I don’t want to generalise but in most cases it’s because someone has applied a relative amount of pressure on him. The girl then says ‘yes’ because wild horses couldn’t tear a diamond from under a girls nose. Also, for the most part, girls live for the proposal moment. As the last whisper of ‘yes’ has left her mouth she transforms into “wedtastic” mode and unfortunately there’s no “off” switch.
In this case, it was a short piece by Roll Call’s Neda Semnani, who writes the “Heard on the Hill” column. From the snarky headline to the factual inaccuracies, it is one steaming, stinking heap of FAIL.
*You don't nap well in the nap nanny (go figure!) so during the day (with close supervision!) I lay you down on your tummy and you nap perfectly! You have good head control already and can turn your head to either side when you are laying down but I still don't feel comfortable laying you on your tummy for nighttime just yet.
I'm definitely FAR from perfect!
I think I look pretty weird in this picture. Why? Hahahhahaah. But anyway interesting pic. Hahahhahaa.
But I never see Bathams at festivals. I never see anyone writing about it. I don't see it in shops.
When I first went to the shooting course with John and he would say shoot, many times I just stood there. Fortunately, John didn't say if you don't shoot next time, I am going to shoot you, but sometimes he would yell. My husband said that weekend one could visible see me fighting my mind. I struggled to get over my fear of shooting my gun. John has a very good ability to know when to push and when not to. There were times he would yell shoot and there were times he would get close in and talk me through it and there were times he and the whole class would stand back and let me work through it. It is no exaggeration to say I would stand there with my gun pointed at the target for several minutes and not shoot. Then take a shot and stand there again for 30 seconds or more.
Of course, education should not be the only way for us to develop our thoughts. Insight can be nurtured from reading, thinking, communicating, and writing.
The first is Chris and Regan frolicking before things get twisted, the second is Regan trying to calm her down when things begin getting crazy. I worry that those two shots get my point across ineffectively, but I appreciate the way Friedkin seems to visually contrast the physicality between mother and daughter before and after the possession. It’s easy to mistake the top image of Chris trying to calm a possessed Regan, and the bottom image – not in emotion – simply seems like a benign embrace – the power of seeing things in motion, of course.
Jen Voight
I had better preface this post by saying that although I have read Less Than Zero (Bret Easton Ellis’s 1985 debut, to which this is a sequel), I can’t remember a thing about it. (Let’s assume, though, that it featured privileged teens getting busy and popping Xanax.) I suppose that if I had loved it, I would have remembered. I have, however, loved the other Ellis books I’ve read – even Glamorama, even The Informers. So my appreciation of this book might have been greater if I’d remembered or liked Less Than Zero; but my overall fondness for Ellis’s stuff means I gave it an enthusiastic, even excitable, welcome when it arrived.
Wednesday 7:00-8:00 pm
Number of deaths could be even higher
licence, yet such policemen are let loose with guns on society...
my child, is when I carried you.”
(Madhulika Sonkar can be contacted at madhulika.s@ians.in)
I like to think of the three-dimensional cube representing a ‘deep or deeper’ depression. Where it is a place that you can get deeply lost. Although you can still find the sides when you are close to them (with enough creativity you can possibly find your way out of anything) it would be relatively easy to slip so far away from safety that in time, you could forget the way it feels to have come back. You would begin to forget what the ‘norm’ feels like, and perhaps forget how to make way to the safe edges again. This points to me the dangerous part of walking the lines of “creative output through managing your levels of depressive moods”. I think that this is the point where you actually ‘lose yourself’, and you simply slip into ‘a feeling of socially exiled status quo’. It’s at this level that creativity actually is harder to keep a grasp on, the resistance between you and the walls is greater, and your thorough output is way less than your norm.
Unter allen die an der Challenge teilnehmen, wird jemand mit dem Random system ausgelost, der diesen süssen La-La Land Crafts "Sweet Dreams Marci" . gewinnt.
Where – 6-15 March
Overall Height: 9.75"
Can't wait for Christmas!
Remembering the good times and forgetting about the bad are the keys to happiness, claims a new study. Researchers found that people with personality traits that allow them to be nostalgic about the past have higher life satisfaction than those who exaggerate or mull over their failures.
All results were inconclusive, including a detailed endoscopy where a digital camera was used to explore Tanvir’s digestive tract.
How many times in our lives do we ask ourselves the question…’WHAT IF’? Often it will cross my mind how different my life would have been IF….I hadn’t lived where I did and met my husband at the local grocery store?
Where is boasting then? It is excluded. By what law? of works? Nay: but by the law of faith. Therefore we conclude that a man is justified by faith without the deeds of the law.
IQPC has recorded some podcasts in which speakers talk about their subjects. Although these are obviously intended as trailers for the conference sessions, they serve also as useful sources of information in their own right – I interviewed Professor Dominic Regan, for example, and what he said formed the basis for an article which I called Professor Dominic Regan on why the Jackson Reforms mean the biggest ever upheaval for UK litigation.
To take the thing away
Today has been an interesting day. I ate breakfast today. I actually forced myself to eat because I wasn’t really hungry. But I ate a Smart Ones Ham, Egg, & Cheese Muffin. And for lunch I ate a Red Baron French Bread Pizza. Dinner I ate a small thing of left over Spaghetti. I was too tired to fix something else.
Biscoff Buttercream
But one guy who was actually pretty nice to the younger folk there was Paul Crabaugh himself. Not that he particularly wanted to play with kids, but he didn’t seem to resent their presence so much as the other older guys did. He never put the younger people down, ever, which seemed to be the stock in trade of his peers.
There is that unmistakable feeling in the air, so difficult to define, yet so very easy to perceive. The sun has gained in strength beyond belief, shining stronger and longer. Finding a spot in our garden, shielded from the westerly winds, I can sit outside for the first time this year, savoring its vital warmth.
The challenge will run for the whole month. Participants must comment on all of the DT blogs during the hop AND participate in the challenge if they want to win the prize: May's KIT!!!
The government contractor source said he told the agents it was a “really bad idea” to take the strippers back to their hotel rooms, but several agents bragged that they “did this all the time” and “not to worry about it,” KIRO reported.
This really makes me point out a few things:
What I love about Amy's style is that she makes flowers look like paintings. Just look at these puppies. I imagine every time she finishes an arrangement a gang of 16th century Flemish still life painters are clapping their hands and raising their chalices of jenever up in Dutch heaven.
The Best Exotic Marigold Hotel isn’t everyone’s cup of tea. It’s a story of a group of seniors living out their retirement years. Hardly thrilling or exciting. It’s a kind of old person’s rom-com.
At the risk of sounding ungrateful, I must tell you that I really don't like being in my apartment much. I say ungrateful because although I have worked hard like many, I have also been lucky. And to live in an 1837 landmark townhouse on Washington Square is one of the rare privileges afforded very few in New York City.
"When do we start training?" Abby demanded, also not touching her stew. "I don't want to lose a minute."
Calvin Peters
Despite what started out as pretty reasonable package prices (by the standards of similar services), and an initially positive review from Mick Rooney at the Independent Publishing Magazine, Raider hasn't been a company I'd recommend, due in part to its origins in inexperience, but also to an unusually restrictive contract for this sort of service.
She needed him to go. She had a client coming in at three a.m. A vampire. One
- Installing OS X 10.8 over 10.7.2 or earlier with FileVault turned on may fail
"Did you used to live in London?" asked Mr8.
Names that simply refer to Bangla or Bengal show a thrust to create a wholly-contained identity, one that is contained within West Bengal’s territorial limits.The name Bangla or Bawngo is not new. However, it is hardly conceivable that a person’s conception of Bangla or Bengal suddenly underwent a radical transformation right after 14th August 1947 in one’s imagination of the place they imagined to be Bangla. The unfortunate illusion that the post-partition generations suffer from has the Bengal of one’s imagination stop at the international border. It is especially acute in West Bengal, which in fact is the smaller of the 2 politico-geographical segments of Bengal. Add to this the primarily Hindu name roll-call of the who’s who of Bengal’s past as taught in West Bengal. What one ends up with is a weird view of Bengal. The very-real presence of East Bengal in Satyendranath Bose’s professorship at Dhaka University, Bankim Chandra Chattyopadhyay’s deputy-collectorship at Jessore, Rabindranath Thakur’s literary productions while being stationed at Shelaidaha in Kushtia, Masterda Shurjo Sen and Pritilata Waddedar’s armed insurrection against the colonial occupation in Chattagram and myriad such events, ideas, conceptions, ownerships, get projected, very-really, imperceptibly but exclusively, onto the physical imaginary of Bengal’s western sliver. It is my suspicion that this psychological phenomenon where trans-frontier locales get uprooted from their real location but do not quite get correspondingly embedded on this side of the frontier leaving places, faces, spaces, events in a strange purgatory of cognitive inaccessibility, is a major sequelae of partition. This possibly has given rise to misshapen, constricted visions of one’s cultural past, severely restricting initiatives of cultural engagement in the present time. Trends that seek to rename West Bengal as simply Bangla or Bengal may only add to this smugness of being complete.
"If Bjork had moved somewhere else, like New York, it would have been a totally different sounding album," says Massey. Yet although it was mostly conceived in London, Post was actually recorded and mixed in the Bahamas at Nassau's famous Compass Point Studio. According to trip hopper Howie B, who engineered Post and co-wrote the frisky Latin house tune "I Miss You", "Despite being in this Caribbean vacation paradise, we only had one day off in three weeks. And because the studios have no windows, we might as well have been in London." Bjork did record some of her vocals with her feet in the ocean, though, thanks to a long microphone cord.
I know 2 posts in 1 day. I have the day off and want to get it all posted.
1/4 cup chopped orange bell pepper
Anyway .. today we shall talk about DARTS on the skirt block.
Hot Lips Honey necklace. 18-inch silver-plated chain with silver-plated hammered circle, double-sided tibetan silver pinup charm, enamel lips charm and a tiny tibetan silver rose. Silver-plated findings.
The scenes were shot on May 1 near Incheon’s Deokjeok Island. A member of the production staff said, “Ha Ji Won and Lee Seung Gi, as they compete against the U.S. in the WOC, will once more show a wild display of action and logical dueling. Please be in anticipation for the emotional twist story that will unfold through the WOC competition as well as the rising conflict with Yoon Je Mun.”
I am prophesying to my children here tonight; out of you shall come president, out of you shall come great rulers, out of you shall come managing directors. In the name of Jesus you will reach the top.
To completely understand speech we must first process the non-linguistic properties, i.e. properties not relating to language. When you are only passing through a new town or country, sometimes that’s all time will permit – so non-verbal communication kicks in and is a sufficient replacement.
I use the term Progressive to cover the ideological outlooks ranging from Liberalism to Marxism which grew out of the Enlightenment. They all believe that change is always better than what is; and that we are ineluctably headed for better world, the brotherhood of man – a Utopia.
I’ve decided to own the wrinkles I have… but just smooth them out a bit. You can barely see the stitches. I’m talking about this piece I did for the sketchbook challenge.
Braving the cliffs and resting in the fields
“The Lord thy God will circumcise thine heart, and the heart of thy seed, to love the Lord thy God, with all thine heart, and with all thine soul.” Deuteronomy 30:6
Bath Bubble and Beyond Handmade Tea Tree Soap is gentle enough to use all over your body, the Tea Tree Oil naturally protects your skin from outbreaks and blemishes while the glycerin prevents your skin from drying out too much.
5. Bathroom Etiquette I: Men Need Space in the Bathroom Cabinet Too
stamping & punching.
Nearly everything in our world from advertizing to self-help books is geared to teach us that we are the center of the universe.
Aftershave
FRENCH GE, ELLISON SE. An influenza vaccination programme for hospital staff – winter 1968-1969. Practitioner 1970; 205: 346-350.
Onion powder Milk ( I used almond, but soy would work…not sure about coconut)
In my experience - the .357 Magnum revolver would have been the killer’s weapon of choice, and also the weapon that inflicted the fatal gunshot wounds. In other words, the shots fired with the .22 rifle may have occurred after the initial fatal shots were fired.
2 mere
As I said the framework is called 'more than just words', sadly it seems the BMA think language is not an aid to recovery, and as such what they say to me are just words.
house of cards and I can’t
Within mythology there are archetypes and tropes that are primordial and cyclical in nature.
let your voice bring me closer
H: Thank you! Blowback is one of the ways that I limit the power of the curse magic in the books. Basically, a piece of each curse comes back at the person casting the curse. Every curse works the worker. To me, blowback feels like a natural consequence of magic, which is why I like it. I think magic should always have a cost.
'Tis the season, right?
And it isn't that I mind them being in the house. I just wish they would be quiet or pay rent or something.
The group is the brainchild of John Dwyer, a singer and guitarist who is a veteran of several bands. Thee Oh Sees includes another guitarist, a female vocalist and keyboard player (the lovely Brigid Dawson) and two drummers and a bassist. They're a prolific crew. This was their second album released in 2011.
The mothers would waddle along besides the chicks, constantly chivving them this way and that, rushing at any bird that landed suspiciously close to them ... I have mentioned before that our hens were free-range, so the poor old girls had a lot of ground to cover and dangers to face down.
The morning after I learned the news I found myself sitting in my empty classroom waiting for the morning bell to ring. Looking at the thirty unoccupied desks in front of me, I got the eerie feeling they were judging me in every aspect of my life and that Mary’s phantom was the prosecutor. Given the number of ways I had failed over the years, I figured it was an open and shut case.
Ever since Elvis, the king of Rock and Roll legitimised incest in the late 1950s, with a movie often described as the epitome of the flourishing Incest genre, rural relatives have been going at it like large, toothless rabbits with nasal twangs. The effects of this can be seen here.
As we went, we came upon two hikers coming down.
I've always liked Kanye West. He might be a bit of an acquired taste but I love him. His music, his style, his girlfriend and even his abrasive attitude towards pretty much everything. The man is undeniably talented.
But get this....I loved Spam....go figure! My mom would make these rockin' spam sandwiches, why she had to go and ruin it by putting green peppers in it is beyond my knowledge.
Yikes! It's been 2 months since my last post. What on earth have I been doing since it's obviously not blogging.
performed abortions!
It's not that we don't know Lucien is a good, sweet, funny kid -- we know it better than anybody. We just haven't gotten many French education officials to agree with us. But then suddenly there she was -- the teacher we thought was the meanest and the most horrible, cheering for our boy all along. (We suspect Lucien behaves in her class because she scares the sh*t out of him, but no matter -- at least we know he can do it.)
2 mo. rest, then BCP month
Pat Cadigan – We’ll Take Manhattan
Every time I pull the bucket up from the well of inspiration it's bone dry. Not a drop in it! Until that resolves itself, have a look at The Last Mortician, by writer Tim Hall and Emmy-winning cartoonist Dean Haspiel. Set the creepy meter to 11.
Commandant, U.S. Marine Corps (‘03-‘06)
Okay, tirade aside, I would LOVE to use this app if it actually does work/exist here in Seattle (I will admit now that I may just not be using the service correctly, any tips Seattle ParkMobile users?) A friend of mine used it on a trip to D.C. and she raved about it!)
but women cool at a slower rate,
Please note the word “willing” in my list of requirements. A man’s effort is worth a lot. If he tries and fails it’s up to you to decide how important that requirement is to you. I came up with this list AFTER being honest about myself about what I am able to give to my partner. This list has helped me avoid HUGE wastes of my time. I will not work harder for someone than they are willing to work for me… point, blank, period. Sometimes writing down what you want/need to be happy and secure in a relationship gives you the strength you need to walk away or work it out.
GUIDED ‘HIDDEN WORLDS’ TOURS
% ls
I poured the diesel back (4 jerries, 80lit approx) in with Mr Funnel, a great product for holding water and other debris. I also injected acetone into the holes I had opened the the windvane rudder.
There are a couple of places we'll have to try next time. There's a local spot in Grand Case that plays great music. I can't think of the name, but it's on the right as you leave Blvd. de Grand Case.
*Inhales deeply* Tolkien.
This post isn't to talk pizza though. I am typing to share that as a contributor to 3-6 Free Resources, I am participating in a HUGE, did I mention HUGE, MayDay Giveaway!
Now I want to stress that I have no strong opinion on the merits of the tanker drivers’ dispute. I don’t really understand what the strike is about and have no opinion as to whether the drivers have a case or not, much less whether strikes are a good idea. I’m an anorak, remember – I only care about getting the law right.
That is what we are REALLY fighting for. The right to be free of the propaganda and censorship that has stood between our illness, and treatment, since 1988.
I am wearing sweater by Isabel Marant.
Pedestrianized High Street
3-4 C morel mushrooms, cleaned and halved lengthwise
Every time I turned around, she'd be there again!
Without You, Jesus. (Without You, Jesus) No I can’t live
When it comes to modesty, it’s not about the hijab or niqab or burka or any sort of covering. It’s about treating people as human beings. It’s about not pushing oneself on them, attacking them.
This is a car-crash waiting to happen.
Not just that.... As always we have a combo too, but with a small twist to it..... The twist is to Add One of Each, creatures.... Big & Small!!!
As for Elvis Costello, I loved 'Oliver's Army' from the first moment I heard it, and I can still sing along to it word for word the whole way through when it plays - just like I remember my national insurance number without looking at it and my first car number plate :)
Eddie Collins
What we have is a square peg in a round hole plot in which the immature Gilmore, fantastic knack for driving the ball he has, does not fit in with the PGA tou. He does bring in the young crowd, so the powers that be reluctantly tolerate him. He makes an enemy in the smarmy Shooter McGavin (Christopher McDonald) McGavin is an amusing antagonist, though one who engages Gilmore too often in the sarcastic remark department in which he is outclassed. The conflict of Gilmore improving his golf game in order to beat McGavin would have been sweeter had Gilmore not already gotten the best of him in other areas.
“deux.”
- Iron
But the weather lately has been more akin to summer, reaching temperatures around 90F/35C. I find myself having flashbacks to CETP orientation in Budapest last August, which is a strangely bizarre experience, because so much has changed (the inevitable result of living abroad, and perhaps a motivating factor for many of us who choose to do so). It serves as a reminder, too, that my time here is growing shorter. My flight home is finally booked (I leave Hungary on the 4th of July) and I keep finding myself thinking of all the things I tentatively planned to do that I haven’t gotten around to yet. And while there is still some time left to cross those things off the list, but it grows shorter every day. I don’t leave for another two months but it’s becoming increasingly difficult not to turn my eyes toward home, and I find myself missing friends and family back in the States more acutely than usual.
His laughter was gleeful. He also had a beautiful voice and liked to sing and hum at every good opportunity - at the dinner table or during a game of rummy or as he walked. For the past few years, living in the aftermath of a series of strokes, he could barely talk; his voice, when he could talk, was hoarse and flat. He didn't laugh either. But to the end he loved music, was moved deeply by it.
Hi everyone! Most of you all know my love for print magazines. Nothing beats a relaxing afternoon browsing through a craft magazine -oh wait, do I actually have relaxing afternoons? Not really, so it's more like browsing on the couch after 9pm when the kiddos are asleep. Well, I am lucky enough to have several designs in the current Paper Creations Magazine Spring issue!
All of this is second-nature to anyone trained, as I was, in the hot-bed of postmodernism that was the Yale English Department in the 1980s. I had the further advantage of Buddhist meditative training -- a long, if somewhat haphazard course of it -- designed to shake the conviction that the world as we perceive it is the world as it is. It's one thing to think that's true: quite a number of people pay lip-service to the idea. But it's quite another to practice seeing, hearing, tasting the "real" collapse in front of you.
But when I stop and think about it, there’s an avalanche of a to-do list looming over my head. Do you have a GP in London? I still need to find one nearby. And then there’s that great painting that’s yet to have been hung. Not to mention … see what I mean?
The Ultimate Fighter (FX)
4 union
Willem Buiter, chief economist at citi and a former UK central banker was quoted as saying,
Young Harry, former man-friend of starlets like Lindsay Lohan and Hayden Panetierre, purchased the property in July 2009 for $1,750,000. At that time the existing residence was but a fatigued, single story mid-century modern originally built in 1963 and in desperate need of an an major face lift. Mister Morton had the modestly-sized single story structure worked over, according to current listing information, by Jeff Allsbrook at Standard who took the house down to its studs and added a second floor master suite complete with paralyzing views that sweep over the whole of Los Angeles' south and western quadrants. Listing information does not offer square footage but does indicate the re-worked, residence—L-shaped with art gallery-style interiors—now contains 3 bedrooms and 3.5 bathrooms.
~ Rim each circle with some glitter glue. Allow it to dry before stacking the layers together. I applied a little bit of two-sided sticky tape between the layers and added the Bo Bunny Jewels and Trinkets to the center. Here are the finished blooms close-up....
- Jason Segel has pretty much confirmed that he is dating actress Michelle Williams. The How I Met Your Mother star said during an interview with Extra; “”I think we would just very much like to be happy. That’s all I’m going to say about it.”
Could you feel the love
Here they are prevailed upon to do the “Cobra Tango” in Under the Pampas Moon (1935)
Though standard rules signs are important, SwimmingPoolSigns’s Funny Pool Signs are an entertaining product line. Signs such as “We Don’t Go Skinny Dippin’, We Go Chunky Dunkin’,” are hilarious options to decorate a pool. Additionally, the retailer also created an amusing cartoon character, “Swimmin’ Sam” to infuse playfulness into pool rules signs. “We are thrilled to be celebrating one year of providing signs to keep swimming the enjoyable activity it is,” said Rivka Fogel, Manager at SwimmingPoolSigns.com. “Thanks to anniversary sales on everything from customizable templates to pool stencils, we truly believe that customers will find any pool-related product they desire.”
thoughts
When I was growing up, it was not uncommon for Mother to wake me in the middle of the night and say, “Sheri, take your pillow and go downstairs.” I knew what that meant. It meant a tornado was coming, and I was instantly afraid. But then Mother would say, “Sheri, everything will be OK.” Her words always calmed me. Today, decades later, when life seems overwhelming or frightening, I call Mother and wait for her to say, “Everything will be OK.”
The Landmarks Preservation Commission met on Tuesday, Oct. 30, to vote on a mess of proposed landmarks and, when the dust had settled, eight NYC buildings were untouchable.
Now, from this moment on, our claimant will no longer be earning a paycheck. His income, hopefully, will be coming from an insurance company. Never before has he found the need to file an insurance claim, which can be an intimidating experience within itself. Then, what about the disability itself? Workouts at his health club, racquetball and golf have all been pleasurable afterhours activities. Will he ever be able to return to those activities again? Doubt and apprehension are now present. Fear, a newfound anxiety and possibly depression will soon be present.
6If I say what is in my mind, my pain becomes no less: and if I keep quiet, how much of it goes from me?
My first dinner only consist of Steamed Ginger Chicken Drumbstick and Lup Cheong (Chinese sausage) Rice. Ya, I know there was no vege because this meal is for one person only, so I didn't want to cook too much. I particullary like the Lup Cheong Rice. I steamed the 2 types (the red colour one & also the Duck Liver sausage) of Lup Cheong first then I cut into small pieces and returned to the cooked rice in the cooker together with the oil & mixed them well. This made the rice so fragrant when I scooped them up. I will definitely try again, though I know is kinda fattening :-)
Summary: One reason Americans observation-orientation-decision-action loop is broken: we love people to give us bad information. Even outright lies are acceptable, if interesting or flattery. As in the media trope “he was wrong, but made us think.” Today’s example is the late Matthew Simmons.
From 1977 till now the CPI(M) had destroyed even the last traces of Bengali culture - the Viswabharati, the university of Rabindra Nath Tagore, the Asiatic Society of Sir William Jones, the works of 19th Century Bengali writers.
Hello guests and readers of my blah, blah, blah. Forgive me for my tardiness. I sometimes type away at a blog entry but refuse to post it until I have pics to back it up which is a bad idea because I sometimes can’t get to downloading those needed pics.
There were at least two fingers on both hands which are strongly suggestive of finger clubbing and all nails have increased curvature whilst the nailbeds are inflamed. He has a kyphoscoliosis with posterior displacement of the right ribs. His chest was fairly quiet with wheezes heard with forced expiration and just an occasional crackle too. There were no localising chest signs. Heart sounds were dual, BP 150/65 and pulse 72/regular. There was no evidence of cardiac failure.
We can only pray that letting him loose is not a gamble with someone else's life.And the Sun, as the Home Office set out, is doing its part perfectly.
This is quite a handsome and functional case. I paid only $25 for it new through a seller on Amazon, which I consider to be quite a deal, but I typically see it listed for $35-$40. Amazon had one of these left in "red" (burgundy), one in silver, a single-pen version and a 3-pen version. (It appears the 3-pen version only has loops inside, rather than sleeves.) Try this Google search, and you'll find eBay listings, too. Or, you could just go with Cross's current line-up, in which the cases are not quite as sleek as this one but still feature the holes (I know there's got to be a better name for that race-car leather look) and an easier closing mechanism than most other cases (magnetic flap rather than a tuck-in flap).
I will finish up this series tomorrow with Part IV of Navigating Change for Makers -
Si quieres saber más sobre el disco anda a COMENTARIOS..!!!!!
With a favorable moon faze and sunny warm days I expect things will be getting a little better. Winter fishing is here so take advantage of this ¨Indian Summer¨ for now…..
Why else would the list of tobacco products be made so small that the older generation, the majority of smokers, will be forced to struggle to read it?
A huge grin appeared on the collies face.
Excuse me, have you seen a wagon full of writers pass by this way? I seem to have lost my place on it.
Hugo-"Should I?"
though the whole house
and he puts on his dark glasses
She offered me a paid commission, to work as a photographer for the charity while I am in Tanzania this summer.
Or drip by drip
If you’re interested in participating for April, please CLICK HERE to fill out the participation form and read the terms and conditions. You will also find contact information on that page for the UK branch of Foodie Penpals if you’re a blogger across the pond!
The next was even more surreal and terrifying. Smurfs porn, which I didn't even know existed until that fateful night. Male Smurf and Smurfette are getting jiggy on a picnic blanket. They're both just actors covered in blue bodypaint. As they fuck about, the paint rubs off on the blanket. Then Gargamel turns up and starts raping Smurfette. Although it's not rape, because she's obviously enjoying it. The only way it could be any more disturbing is if it were Simpsons porn.
You see she loves pleasure, and all things fine, as the Beau Epoch drew to a close, this coat encapsulates so much of what that era had been. The Japanese influence, that shaped the look of Art Nouveau, and introduced new shapes to gowns and coats, the feel of luxury reflected in this last age where the aristocracy, who lived their lives solely in the pursuit of pleasure, still led fashion.
They sit down in their bullet proof cars, and staggering mansions, while the people who elected them are being slaughtered into limbs and heads on the streets. We have become puns in the hands of these animals masquerading as leaders.
7. Fear Not My Child
A sales tax increase took effect in July, raising the rate from 6% to 6.35% and adding a further 3 percentage point levy on luxury goods such as expensive cars and boats. The state collects the third-highest property taxes per capita and is one of 14 states to tax Social Security income, according to CCH.
Launched at midnight by The Sikh Coalition, the FlyRights app had fielded two complaints by 10 a.m. EDT Monday.
““I am the Creator of the heavens and the earth, one in Divinity with the Father and the Holy Spirit. I am the one who spoke to the patriarchs and the prophets and the one whom they awaited. For the sake of their longing and in agreement with my promise, I assumed flesh without sin and concupiscence, by entering the womb of the Virgin like the sun shining through the clearest gem. For just as the sun does not damage the glass by entering it, likewise the virginity of the Virgin was not lost when I assumed Manhood. I assumed flesh in such a way that I did not have to forsake my Divinity, and I was no less God – with the Father and the Holy Spirit, governing and upholding all things – although I was in the womb of the Virgin in my human nature. Just as brightness is never separated from fire, so too, my Divinity was never separated from my Humanity, not even in death.
FANTASY SUITE!
One friend described the one as just someone whom you could grow old together with that not only loves you but tolerates you no matter what, that you can be together even if the passion dies out. Another friend described the one as being the person that loves you as much as you love them, that you feel able to be yourself around them and feel safe around them. But it goes deeper than that surely? Or did I genuinely have such an unrealistic view of the one that my failed relationships of the past were such failures because of my thinking that these people I had been involved with were truly not the one; that they did not fit into my own personal definition? In fact, that then got me thinking that if some of us have rather elaborate and romantic views of the one; are we destined to be alone forever? Or is there such thing as magic and that the modern view of the one is just a definition born to those who don’t believe in what true love is?
1 alas
And don’t worry, all this ‘work’ also includes plenty of meetings, time in the office and jacking cafe’s for their wireless. Speaking of which, gotta run!
The Hinds House now and close to when it was originally built.
Kid Icarus
He didn't want to walk with me. It was all I could do to say, "I almost shut that invite down, gramps. But I am trying to be a nice person. I am, amazingly enough, super interesting. But whatever, WWII baby. Head east for all I care."
For my birthday, they got me shea butter-infused fuzzy socks, Pink Chiffon and Paris Amour lotions from Bath and Body Works, and MADE ME A TARDIS!!!!
I personally am not following the meal plan provided in the book (although it looks pretty delicious) but I am instead making my own dishes as I am an avid cook and love to be in the kitchen. Today is Day 2 of the challenge…already I have failed and had cream in my coffee this morning. However, I have decided not to start the challenge over, but rather make note of my indiscretion and move on to day 3. :)
anyway, watching little house, going out for breakfast tomorrow morning if anything is open!
An ad-hoc High School reunion tomorrow. Many old acquaintances, some old friends….
On the other side, several units have crossed the Brora, finding the Scottish schiltrons waiting for them with sharp pointy sticks (twice as long as a man :) in their hands! Another unit of norsemen is brought down, impaled by pikes.
like presents, fast food. But now I feared his honeyed embrace,
One thing that has struck me recently, especially with the babies around, is how well behaved the hogs have been towards one another. However, we see a little piece of bad behaviour here at around the 7 minutes mark.
I know taste is subjective, and there’s no real way to set a standard for the quality of a piece of writing. Generally speaking, I like flash fiction. I don’t think I have a particularly short attention span, but I don’t get a lot of time to read, and having written flash fiction from time to time I understand and appreciate the challenges of the form. When it’s done well, it can be astonishingly good. But there is a lot that’s just plain awful. And a lot of it seems to be winning decent sums of money in competitions.
The fact that our Board has traditionally mismanaged district finances requiring no accountability in any area of spending has nothing to do with our current financial predicament.
So I'm going to share my winner recipe with you!
Make the goat cheese layer: In a food processor or with an electric mixer, blend the goat cheese, eggs, cream, rosemary, pepper, and salt until smooth. Set aside.
I’m a descendant of a Native American, a convict, an amusement park owner, a clothes stealer and a reluctant Quaker.
All in all it is a great stout to savor I believe at any time of the year, not just in the colder months when stouts are traditionally consumed.
“That’s only one assignment.”
In truth, Brussels, in it's endless self righteousness and arrogance has made sure that reintegrating a bankrupt and economically sinking and rapidly deindustrializing Ukraine will be all that much easier.
Wakey Wakey Theme Tune 0:22
In October 1991, Petitioner, appearing pro se, filed the present petition for relief pursuant to Sec. 2254 in the United States District Court for the Western District of Oklahoma. In this petition, Petitioner raised the following two grounds for relief: (1) he was denied his Sixth Amendment right to the effective assistance of counsel because of his attorney’s conflict of interest–i.e., the same attorney represented both Petitioner and Dodson; and (2) the separate convictions and sentences for felony murder and the underlying felony–i.e., armed robbery, violated the Double Jeopardy Clause of the Fifth Amendment. Respondent filed a motion to dismiss the petition for failure to exhaust state remedies as to Petitioner’s claim of ineffective assistance of counsel.
Judge Pitts said he was not sure what use the ordinary people of Delta State were making of such facilities, but in any case it was not for him to judge Ibori’s overall performance as governor but rather to sentence him for his specific crimes.
The May 2012 issue of the Journal of Intellectual Property Law & Practice (JIPLP) is now available in full to online subscribers. It's the issue which coincides each year with the INTA Meeting and which carries the keenly-awaited and much-appreciated round-up of Community trade mark decisions from the Court of Justice and General Court in the European Union by editorial board member Arnaud Monguiral-Folliard.
I don't want to ban her and of course it's wonderful that lots of children (including me) have in the past been turned on to reading by her books. But I think it's time quietly to let Enid Blyton die a natural death. No amount of tinkering will make her read like a writer writing today and she just isn't that good.
years). (2009 Lease agreement can be provided if needed) (NOTE: For the past three years, The Pet
But you can do the job
My heart refuses to turn from defeat
"One"
Forever Friends decoupage
Diana, Suzanne & the Magnolia-licious DT
Looking to settle down on the shores of Lake Ray Hubbard or in one of the many spectacular neighborhoods throughout Rockwall, but just not ready to buy yet- then look no further. Rockwall homes available now for under $2500/mo
- Coastal Scents 88 palette
Her dramatic death unleashed a tidal wave of speculation. Alex Jones and his Infowars organization pointed out that Palfrey had repeatedly stated in interviews that she would not commit suicide and stated that if she was found dead it would really be murder. Her mother had no signs that she was suicidal, and some handwriting experts claimed that the suicide note was either forged or written under compulsion. Journalist Dan Moldea told Time that Palfrey had told him she would commit suicide before enduring prison again, but Jones pointed out that Moldea has a known history of fabricating quotes. In the end, it doesn’t really matter whether she put the noose around her own neck or it was put there by men in black: it was murder in any case. There is no moral difference between directly executing a victim, inducing her to kill herself by threats against her mother and sister, or driving her to suicide via persecution, robbery, psychological torture and the looming threat of a horrible jailhouse death by rape, torture and disfigurement. “Suicide” has been the preferred method of execution for women who embarrass the rulers of decaying republics since at least Roman times, and the purpose of the kangaroo court which precedes the murder is merely to humiliate the victim, to tantalize her with false hope of acquittal and to allow the sleeping masses the illusion that there is still such a thing as justice.
Conte doesn’t play on every track. But when he does, his guitar compatibly fuels the fluidity of the rhythm section and provides an appropriate undertone to propel the other players to some notable work as evidenced particularly on “Scarborough Fair,” “Quiet Dawn” and “I’m the Air.” Like Quincy Jones, Nicola Conte is particularly adept at attracting and assembling a worldly group of musicians from a variety of different backgrounds to pontificate perfectly in their own manner in the leader’s given medium.
PS. I also think I managed to transfer my Google connect Followers to the new site, please let me know if this is working properly for you as I update the new site. Thanks so much!
ME - Let me bring in some reinforcements. I'd better check I'm not going mad.
Her father with the same bemused smile as before walks over to where she is standing. Then taking a large hop from just behind her gives the net a hard swat.
Don't get caught up in me worship. Take time to deconstruct that throne by starting to serve others.
And now I’m sitting here in my golden-yellow dining room – incredible lilacs on the table set with my favorite Lenox pattern – enjoying the Coq Au Vin I learned to make at Le Cordon Bleu in Paris. And I sparkle like the diamonds on the ring finger of my right hand as I celebrate his absence.
Both Samsung and HTC have turned to Corning to keep their lustrous screens safe, using the second-gen Gorilla Glass. According to Corning, Glass 2 offers the same level of protection, though it’s slimmer, which is probably part of the explanation how the two behemoths managed to keep their waistlines so marvelously slim.
“A woman?”
My favorite vacation that I have ever taken was probably the Duquesne Organ Department’s trip to France in the Summer of 2010. However, that is not quite affordable for a college student so I would have to say my favorite affordable vacation spot is down in Florida. I have some relatives there and we go at least every other year to different parts of the state and do a lot of fishing, boating, and other warm weather activities.
Siregar was quoted as saying that no deal has been made between Muamalat and potential investors. Yet, another report in Kontan.co.id noted that at least two other banks, Bank Mega and Standard Chartered Bank, were said as eyeing Muamalat.
The board game is pretty much like Monopoly, you have to obtain dice (you get one for free every 10 minutes) and then you can roll it and land someplace on the board. You can either land on a quest, a bonus, or a mystery spot.
Over the fold, I provide a rudimentary theory of dynastic politics. I think this quick-and-dirty theorising has considerable explanatory power. Further, the theory can actually make some normative claims about under what circumstances, dynastic politics can actually improve things. And the theory has important implications for non-dynastic politics.
Annette Annette
Just then I heard Slinky call me from her bed. I went in to give her a goodnight kiss and she told me "Mommy we bought you flowers." I later learned from Hubs that it was not his doing at all. They had all gone to the store and when the girls saw the flowers, they wanted to buy some for Mommy. Hubs thought it was a great idea. So there you have it. I got flowers.
I used to think the saddest thing was that the scar was forever. But I was wrong, the saddest thing is that the scar was never forever.
Can we hope for this sort of transparency with other Controllers that decide post grant proceedings? Wouldn't it be far better if our CG, PH Kurian issues an order stipulating that all such opinions shall be made public? In fact, this was one of the requests in our petition calling for more patent information to be made public. We collected more than 250 signatures and we want to thank our many readers for their continued support to this cause.
O’er the land of the free and the home of the
By Teri Harvey
Why is it that a student would think that the rule doesn't apply to them? Why would a student go so far as to contact the dean to try to get the rule changed? Why do so many of the students I teach or talk to think that they are entitled to be the exception to any rule they choose not to follow? I think it is because no one has ever bothered to tell them no and that they are turning into a bunch indulged, entitled brats. All I can say is that if you can't take a test on time because you can't be bothered to read the class calendar correctly, how can I trust that you will bother to learn anything in nursing school before you are unleashed on sick patients? Your actions (or lack thereof) have consequences - sometimes big, sometimes small, but consequences nonetheless. Sometimes you won't get caught, but sometimes you will and you better be ready to pay the price.
The Holy Mass, celebrated in the respect of the liturgical norms and with a fitting appreciation of the richness of the signs and gestures, fosters and promotes the growth of Eucharistic faith. In the Eucharistic celebration we do not invent something, but we enter into a reality that precedes us, more than that, which embraces heaven and earth and, hence, also the past, the future and the present. This universal openness, this encounter with all the sons and daughters of God is the grandeur of the Eucharist: we go to meet the reality of God present in the body and blood of the Risen One among us. Hence, the liturgical prescriptions dictated by the Church are not external things, but express concretely this reality of the revelation of the body and blood of Christ and thus the prayer reveals the faith according to the ancient principle “lex orandi – lex credendi.” And because of this we can say “the best catechesis on the Eucharist is the Eucharist itself well celebrated”. It is necessary that in the liturgy the transcendent dimension emerge with clarity, that of the mystery, of the encounter with the Divine, which also illumines and elevates the “horizontal,” that is the bond of communion and of solidarity that exists between all those who belong to the Church. In fact, when the latter prevails, the beauty, profundity and importance of the mystery celebrated is fully understood. Dear brothers in the priesthood, to you the bishop has entrusted, on the day of your priestly Ordination, the task to preside over the Eucharist. Always have at heart the exercise of this mission: celebrate the divine mysteries with intense interior participation, so that the men and women of our City can be sanctified, put into contact with God, absolute truth and eternal love….
He is the one who can set our sails right,
Another beer that I often find myself drinking as the weather turns is Fullers 1845. Fullers brew a range of fruity and malt accented ales on the road to Heathrow airport in London. 1845 is a rich tangy strong ale that combines toasty caramel malt flavours and a ‘sherbety’ marmalade accented yeast note with an earthy English hop character. The result makes a fantastic accompaniment to roast lamb, slow cooked beef, or a nice sharp traditional English cheddar.
Now I dey look for room I go fit manage wit my family. Mama junior don mis her mensis and fear dey cash mi,sake of say if she get belle again I no go fit…I no go fit do anytn again. She no dey complain but mi sef I no say bus no b place were woman and pikin supose stay, I follow Chibuzo fight one day becoz he dey try sleep wit Nkechi. Wetin I go do now ehn? How I go take do am? I no wan fail my family but at d same time life too hard for me. Nkechi tok say make I do private driver,if e no work wetin I go do? All dz tn dey scata my hed,dey shook me for bodi. Hmmmmm…
So what can we do about it? We need to come together as a community to plan for a better, stronger, more revitalized future for the Valley. The Lehigh Valley’s economy may be slowly recovering, but we still have a long way to go. And our local and state governments can’t do it alone. They need your input. Add your thoughts here, contact your local officials, or voice your opinion at local meetings. Do you want the future of the Lehigh Valley to be determined by chance or by choice?
First I painted my nails with Misa On the Edge. I took out my sponge and sponged my nails with Zoya Robyn, leaving 1/3 from the tip as my base colour. After that I mixed Zoya Robyn with H&M Love at First Sight and sponged the tip. That is my base, the ocean.
But as I said the way this thing has been drawn out just amazes me so who knows. One thing is for sure we slip further down daily and things have not gotten better but worse so even if it still drags on and on we all know where it is heading.
The not-quite-so-nice boy and I got together on New Year's Eve.
Thier sarks, instead o' creeshie flannen (Greasy flannel),
Charlie also calls saying that she is getting phone calls asking if David will be at the youth center or not so Rowland and Joan decide to send David to school and the youth camp and hope it will blow over. As you might think, this does not blow over and Dustin’s mother takes it to a whole other level, constantly campaigning against allowing David to be back in the youth center. Of course, David is very upset and he is being bullied at school so Joan and Rowland decide to home school him for a little while.
Again chilled well in advance for after work on St Pats day and poured in the same fashion as the Guinness Draught can. Kilkenny is a very different beast, This what my mates have at the irish pub if they are not keen on the black stuff.
I'm here.
In three (3) packaging magazines, I scanned 20 QR Codes (15 of them were in one magazine). The uses for these were widespread; 11 went to instructional videos, 6 went to company websites, 1 article, 1 info page and 1 free offer in which the QR Code was no longer active (go figure).
In exchange for Harman’s help, the sources said, the suspected Israeli agent pledged to help lobby Nancy Pelosi, D-Calif., then-House minority leader, to appoint Harman chair of the Intelligence Committee after the 2006 elections, which the Democrats were heavily favored to win.
Our Solution for Architecture and Interiors
The sky flew from Matthew’s plimsolls, ripples spreading and swallowing cirrus and cumulus and an aeroplane and cumulonimbus. A duck shuffled past. The sun started to set and the sky turned furious orange and Matthew was bathing in light, suddenly, walking in fire.
The eighteenth century martial artist’s skills were not necessarily limited to armed conflict. Wrestling was a common and well-favoured sport, and could often be applied to defence. Some styles have come down to us today with strong codes and rules maximising their usability at sporting matches and effectively limiting their use in earnest in serious conflict. However, it is unclear that the wrestling rules we have today limited sporting practice in the 18th century. Some styles such as ‘catch as catch can’ from the North of England are so effective in disabling opponents that it has influenced the form of modern arts such as Mixed Martial Arts (MMA) and Japanese shoot fighting. There are wrestling traditions surviving all across Europe, and forms of unarmed striking combat using fist, feet, heads and an array of other limbs and digits existed in the middle ages and Renaissance and thrived throughout the 18th century.
However, efforts to raise awareness, tolerance, and respect sometimes leads to more separation. After all, in order to talk about race, ethnicity, and culture, we must first sort everyone into specific categories — categories that some people never knew they were a part of. We have to draw lines — lines that may have never been noticed before. In a kind of Michael Scott moment, someone at work (trying to lead a discussion about stereotypes) asked a student, “So what are some of the things, for example, that might be true of all German students?” The student couldn’t answer the question because she had never stereotyped a German before. But she learned how to do it in that “educational” session!
close business partner of Joseph Kennedy, a devoutly Roman Catholic
The government of Prime Minister Aldo Moro reached a “secret non-belligerence pact between the Italian state and Palestinian resistance organisations, including terrorist groups. Moro designed the terms of the agreement with Arab terrorists, Cossiga said. “The terms of the agreement were that the Palestinian organisations could even maintain armed bases of operation in the country, and they had freedom of entry and exit without being subject to normal police controls, because they were ‘handled’ by the secret services.”
Please link up your creation below!
* Finals - inserted 1:32
“After three years, you think you would have memorized the bell schedule,” Nikolas said. “And people are packing up.”
Montserat
The claim on the label of Badger's Blandford Fly is that this beer is "subtly spiced with ginger."
In the middle, the beautiful, peaked, luscious results of the recipe in the most recent edition of Mastering the Art of French Cooking by Julia Child, Louisette Bertholle and Simone Beck. I doubt the original edition recommends using a food processor over a blender (which I followed because my blender gave up, possibly a casualty of the current Mercury retrograde), but there’s no way I’d hand-whip this recipe. It combines an egg and two yolks with two cups of oil, added at such a slow trickle that my hand hurt from pouring and the food processor squealing its own objections. The first cup alone took longer than 15 minutes; the total blending came in at closer to 35-40. But oh the taste and texture. When time allows, this is the recipe I will invoke.
What if I’ve been blue,
Some shortages have occurred due to demand, and I apologize for that. The vast majority of orders are going through smoothly and quickly.
The writer would like the entire world to learn how to copy Wii games. If you want to join the cause, check out his website, and learn how to copy Wii games today.
Pour chocolate filling into baked pie crust. Bake for 30-35 minutes, or until chocolate filling is set and does not move when pie is lightly shaken. Remove from oven.
I think I spent longer figuring out the pattern than actually sewing, but now that I've done it it seems easy. (Why did I wait so long!) I made it using the summery new California Girl range. My rotary-cutting and machine-sewing both leave a lot to be desired, but the point is, I gave it a go.
What is your favourite aspect of THE EMERALD CITY? The characters.
All cuts are from the Create a Critter cartridge and can be found on p. 71 of the manual. For the moon, I cut it, layer 1, 2 and 3 at 2". The stars I cut at 1" and also at 1 1/2". The sheep was cut at 3" using Lamb, layer 1, 2 and the accessory. All were cut at 3". To give it depth, I chalked around all edges and also ran the clouds and Lamb's wool through my Cuttlebug using my Divine Swirls Cuttlebug folder. I love this whimsical swirl and use it often for clouds or wool. I added dimensionals to the sheep. For the stars, I also added some yellow Stickles. Don't you love Stickles!!!!!
4 air
The man's act was perfect; teacherly calm, the friendly pose of an old man's wisdom, a hint of an underlying ferocity of devotion to peace between the Realms. But even with his head pounding, trying to watch every other figure before him at the same time, Rel didn't miss the man's shiver as he stepped into the close embrace of the Stable Rod's effect. A Wilder, one even more potent than Taslin.
proud because I usually eat when I am stressed.
Sony Electronics will present its latest news and technologies for professional production for HD, 3D and 4K in a range of markets and applications.
'I write poems as a sort of diary,' Susan tells Madame Arcati. 'So they go back years. Some of them are just a moment trapped in time.'
Among the speakers was Sarah Yeung, an immigrant from Hong Kong, shared a moving testimony about developing an eating disorder after relocating to the U.S. and the challenges she faced getting treatment. Another woman named Tracy Smith spoke on behalf of her daughter, Reanna, who died while waiting for treatment to be approved. Tracy had been told by her insurance company that her daughter’s eating disorder was not “life threatening” and denied treatment. Desperate, Tracy took a new job with a better insurance plan, but Reanna died just two weeks before the plan would have come into effect.
So I'll do my best to start writing again.
"Don't worry about anything. You don't need to bring anything. Just get dressed in comfortable clothes, brush your teeth, comb your hair, and please don't fight or bug each other while getting ready," I assured them.
"So, you'd describe their state of mind as 'drunk' when they were found? Are you saying their disorientation was due to excessive drinking?"
This could be good for the future, maybe a good angle to introduce the likes of Chavo Guerrero were they to join.
The first step to reform is not knowledge. Not logic. But rage, contempt at what we have become. From that other things can flow, good or bad depending on our character.
I was lucky to win a copy of this book over at the It’s a Crime! blog, which was particularly lucky as I’m not sure I would have bought a book that centres around bullfighting. This is the author’s first crime fiction book, and I think it’s an excellent start.
Dr George Laquis says our state cancer care is disastrous! And after their attempt to cover up RadiationGate a few weeks ago, and this latest suggestion to put an oncology facility in Penal, I have to agree with him….get out of Cancer care….get out of managing Health care period, because you doing a piss poor job! Fund it and find another body to manage it. How is it that a country like Cuba with far fewer resources can have such effective health care and we swimming in oil $$$$ for almost 4 decades and can’t even manage enough beds and medication for our ill????? You won’t get a comment on this from Kamla or Fuad…don’t hold your breath!
I say we watched it. We watched about 20 minutes of it with various friends whose children also ambushed them with a desire to watch. Just as the actual princess got out of her actual car to walk down the aisle, they all lost interest, leaving us adults to watch awkwardly and make wry comments.
This fortnight we want to see your creations that are funny or that use a pun. Make us smile or use some wordplay. Lots of scope for interpretation, right? And don't forget that you now have TWO weeks to play along in each challenge, so you have an extra week to join in. Now let's see what our Design Team members have created:
8. New window shades
Experienced traffic police often say some people's driving is mental - but one joked: "On this occasion it was dental."
Interestingly, it is in the exact location of Deadman's Curve, the deadly stretch of cable-car railing that was the site of several deaths in the 1880s and '90s. Today Gandhi could turn left and check out the fashions at the Diesel clothing store. Or turn all the way around and replace those sandals at the Discount Shoe Warehouse. Ack.
And yet . . . it still felt shallow, even lazy, at times. Was the cute little sister really necessary? Ditto for the pervy best friend. In fact, all of the "friend" characters in the film might as well have worn signs saying, "Hello, I'm a plot device for a main character and have no real, un-cliche qualities of my own." Hate that. The subplot with Hector's job felt tacked on and rushed. Finally, Rachel's father, who I think was supposed to be endearingly absentminded, just came across as mentally ill to me.
No, I don’t think so either. Small, minute, even, but a little annoying. Moving on.
ETA: Upon seeing that the this week's Ways to Use It Challenge is Silhouette -- I'm entering this one. Perfect timing! Yay!!
And in one Lord Jesus Christ, the only-begotten Son of God, begotten of the Father before all worlds; God of God, Light of Light, very God of very God; begotten, not made, being of one substance with the Father, by whom all things were made.
1 giving
6 walked
The American Civil Liberties Union sued to have the law overturned. The case was rejected by a lower court, but the ACLU appealed, and are currently awaiting a ruling the U.S. Seventh Circuit Court. A representative from the Illinois chapter told me he'd hoped to hear from the court ahead of the G20 and NATO summits.
We tried for months to get him to hit the gym with me but that was an epic fail due to the hours we keep and his new job. We only have so many gym options in a small town. After ruling out 4 rounds of sex a day and other calorie burning options he decided P90X would be worth it so we jumped on the bandwagon.
It was the 10th anniversary of Elvis's death and all the TV channels were in Elvis over-drive.
Barn Owl…
ending rivalry with reflectional
Kristen's teacher had no idea how it happened. She just sent Kristen immediately down to the director's office. The mom said that her daughter and Kristen had finished their cutting project at the table. Kristen than turned to her daughter and said "do you want to play beauty shop?" At that moment, I think Kristen just then proceeded to "play beauty shop" and cut her hair. Her daughter was not upset at all, but I bet more shocked that Kristen just had cut her hair. Not that this makes cutting anyone's hair right, but the intent and learning how it happened made me feel better. We just need to teach Kristen that beauty shop with real scissors is a bad idea. Once again, that filter she has and needs help with. She did not mean to do anything bad and did not even do it just because. She thought it was okay. What a blessing that this mom helped us figure this out...
1 c. shredded cheddar cheese ( 4 ounces)
In the darkest dawn
Moreover, I actually picked up some useful knowledge about medicine, diseases and the human body. Many of our patients were suffering from the same ailments, so after a while, I knew exactly what to advise someone to do when they complained of having a burning sensation in their mouth or said their head felt like it was spinning when they were lying in bed. Dr. Nitesh’s diagnoses also made me realize that since my arrival in Peru, I have probably had some combination of acid reflux, gastritis and stomach parasites.
New Democracy is Greece’s main centre-right party which joined PASOK in November 2011 in a ruling coalition. Support for ND has decreased since it united with PASOK.
We will... I always thought I'd want it to be a surprise but...
The report notes it is not clear whether Mthethwa knew where the money came from.
Provincial/Associated Joint Secretaries
I feel like my old self again.
But they wouldnt give her a medal because her time disqualified her... REALLY??
I don't have to put my Cuttlebug away and I can now use my Imagine as well!!!
For full Lecture…
Cream Medallion Rug, Target. $79.99 - $143.99 (Reg. $199.99 - $359.99)
People do not own people. They cannot. People are made up of not only a body, but a mind, a spirit and a soul as well. A body might be married off, as in
BLITZER: Senator?
Now this was a very good deal.
Srishti Shetty is unemployed girl halled from Mangalore. She comes to Mumbai city and is staying with her cousin Priya. Priya is employed as personal Secretary for two years. Her theory is that the efficient lady secretary is one who marries her boss at the earliest. So she has a mission of marrying her boss. Srishti is not interested in Priya’s theory Priya recommends Srishti to become a secretary. Somehow Srishti is trying to learn & understand the secretary ship and its responsibility from Priya.
Ah children…. they grow up so fast….
The three original tracks are typically As I Lay Dying and typically impressive. ‘Paralysed’ kicks off proceedings with a solid dose of robust pummelling and insurgent riffs powered by the as usual impressive combined growls and clean vocals of Tim Lambesis and bassist Josh Gilbert respectively. The great melodic play makes the track not the most punishing the band has ever produced but does set things up for the crushing assault of ‘From Shapeless to Breakable’. Whereas the opener almost takes its time to consume this goes straight for the throat with a dark thrash metal aggressive insurgency. The drums from Jordan Mancino are attention grabbing and frame the song wonderfully as the guitars of Nick Hipa and Phil Sgrosso crash and entice in equal measure.
about a half an inch, pinching the wool together. then between
Speaking of authors I'll probably never meet -- Frank Wheeler, Jr has a new book out. Right now. Like now, folks. It's called THE WOWZER.
April is National Child Abuse Prevention Month, a time to recognize that we can each play a part in promoting the social and emotional well-being of our children and the kids in our communities.
Don’t fake humility. Pretending to be humble isn’t the same as being humble, and often people who pretend to be humble do it in order to seek out praise. Other people will recognize this, and even if you fool some, you won’t derive the same benefits as you would through actually developing humility.
WinterCoat WinterCoat Double Hop
My guess is that he had turned twenty-five, give or take, and as suspected, the birthday boy had organized the night. He and his buddies were in the modern young man's idea of Dressed Up. To my eyes it looked somewhere between late Jimmy Durante and early Groucho Marx, but what do I know? White ties and black shirts come and go in the fashion world like transmissions on a Cadillac.
by a pulley rope hanging from the ceiling.
The 1st bottle I ever had was really good.
Upon the party’s return to camp from their foray into the Ashen Wastes, numerous new arrivals were found to await them outside of their newly constructed gatehouse. Several processions set to meet the adventurers upon their appearance:
Originally sentenced to seven years ("You'll be out in three," his mother calls to him in the courtroom), he has now served 34 uninterrupted years, 30 of them in solitary confinement. Why? We don't know. The movie doesn't know. If Bronson knows, he's not telling But Roger, we do know: from making an in-house ruckus! Just because you're in jail when you assault guards and hold people hostage doesn't stop it from adding time to your sentence. If he'd been a good boy he'd been out in four, but assault charges do add up, murder or none. So it's hard to feel like he's a victim of the system. Then again, it's more like the system is a victim of him, and that's why the film works even without going too deep under the skin. He's not that much of a threat to society--besides petty robbery--but he is a threat to the penal system. Brit corrections can't do a thing with a guy who actually likes being forced into prolonged periods of solitary confinement--or pretends to. Every time he gets his act a bit together the warden cautiously grants him some privileges, only to regret it, time and again, culminating in the tragic climax wherein he holds his own art teacher hostage for 44 insane hours.
Jesus said in Matthew 5:17 that he came not to destroy the law, but to fulfill it. It is very important to note that Christ never condemned one’s attempt to follow the law. Many love to quote passages where Christ condemned the Pharisees for their fake religious show and their corrupt perversion of righteousness. CHRIST NEVER CONDEMNED RIGHTEOUS LIVING OR FOLLOWING THE LAW.
971. Cascadian Farms Cinnamon Crunch Cereal @ Home (Phoenixville, PA) 10:22 a.m.
Notes: I used small red onions.
I also tried book swaps. There's a guy in UPLB who sells his entire collection of books for about 30 to 80 pesos per title because he's migrating to another country and he has no place in his luggage to carry his massive collection. Ask your friends if you can do book swaps. That way, you can save up on buying new books and you can get rid of old ones which you're probably sick of reading anyway. Remember: Someone's garbage may be someone else's treasure. :)
*Spend time of course in the word since I am way behind on my bible reading for the year.
147. “Our doubts are traitors, and make us lose the good we oft might win, by fearing to attempt.” – Shakespeare
I was speechless and must’ve looked stupid. Or deaf.
Carrot and swede soup
Have an awesome day!
LOLUCKYVE
Sometimes, you just end up at a lot of bars in one week.
What a day...
Assalamualaikum and hello everyone,
The ‘King of the road’ ran like a mouse,
Things were not looking too pretty at this point! I figured out what I wanted to go back on the shelf, purged out a few of the books to donate, and then pulled out the shelf from the wall and cleaned behind it good. After dusting off the shelves, I was ready to do some organizing...but first, a prettification was in order!
Frankly, I think doing what I've done has added years but that doesn't matter. I'm ok with it either way.
In an amusing side story State Senator Constance Johnson of OKC decided to add an amendment to the bill stating:
and just to show you what a charmer this horse is....... a couple of photos I got a few weeks ago!!
When the first inkling of stress began the day after Thanksgiving, I practiced my yoga breathing, slightly calming myself. This year I was going to focus more on the actual doing, and waaaaaaaaaay less on the getting done. To that end, and in keeping with holiday tradition, I made a list, but not a list of "to dos" or "to buys." The list isn't about accomplishing anything or checking things off of it. I titled it "Things I Enjoy about the Holidays." Over the last couple of weeks, I've been adding to it, while at the same time carefully curating, so as not to include anything out of pure obligation or because the collective "we" has been doing it forever.
1. Done Brothers – owners of the BetFred brand and now the Tote
and in his word I hope;
With regards to the kind of business, its manager has to get it covered in the appropriate manner. Absolutely everyone which includes business property holders, manufacturing plant managers and shop keepers really should shield their properties against negative happenings. A number of the occasions which usually mandate getting covered are outlined in subsequent text.
Very much later they head for the hotel and ask for rooms. The hotel manager states that they only have one available. Hex and Smith eye each other and decide to share the bed.
So the question that is being asked is what on earth, therefore, is he doing? One Khazakh official is quoted by the Financial Times as saying:
lost. So when I wrote a song I'd start to imagine who would be the
Unexpectedly (and in a departure from Lem's cerebral novel), a new feeling then creeps into the film, and it becomes an intensely intimate and expressive love story between the guilt-ridden Kelvin and the increasingly self-aware Hari. Tormented astronaut revisited by dead love interest seems a bit hokey and maudlin - if dead wives are going to come back to astronauts, we think the eyeless hellraiser type is much more fun - but it's handled with a beautiful, brooding passion. The credit for this goes as much to director Andrei Tarkovsky as to the actors Donatas Banionis and Natalya Bondarchuk. Banionis seems like the love child between Oliver Reed's intensity and Stellan Skarsgard's slouching sexiness, his look of perpetual torment is perfect for this role - if ever someone looked world-weary on an interstellar scale...! Natalya Bondarchuk likewise has a poignant innocence, and the initially vacant creepiness gives way, after self-awareness, to a sad sort of dignity. Kelvin may be the nominal hero, but Hari is the heroic one.
The Office Character Andy Bernard once said “The drama. I hate the DRAMA!” in an episode of The Office. But in this case, last night at the NFL Draft, I think as fans we can all say that “we loved the drama.”
When did the Greek system collectively become so publicly crass? Why is it that women are proud to be labeled “TFM Sweethearts” on a site that also says women should make sandwiches? As chapters and systems across the nation face increasing scrutiny for alcohol poisoning and sexual assault cases, why aren’t we doing something to stop the issue?
LeGrand
"I want you to be happy. I want you to see the world for all it can be. I want you to find the things you love to do and do them as much as you want. I want you to develop your own definition of success, and then pursue it like a dog on a bone. I want you to know that I will support and love you, even if you're down. And I have only one real expectation and hope - that you believe what I just said, and that you call bullshit on me when I deviate."
File Upload/Distribution Sites
I don't know if you are sentimental about pictures like I am, but I thought this video was cute. It shows just how important pictures are. They are important, but why do we not store them and take care of them the way we should.
This is wisdom which man must learn.
Welcome to the fourth character-specific reaction to Joss Whedon’s THE AVENGERS. I’ve already written a 4,200+ word review of the film, but that wasn’t nearly enough to cover everything I wanted to talk about, so I’m going to write character-specific reactions to delve a bit deeper into the film. You can find all of the relevant AVENGERS links at the bottom of this post.
In other words, we learn that there is such as thing as 'good'. Then, we learn that what we do is 'good', meaning that we are 'good'.
It makes me want another glass of wine.
Coloured or black and white? this is Gay's question today. She could not choose which version she prefers, so I post both and you let us know which you prefer.
Chewy Oatmeal Toffee Cookie Granola
I’m not to, not to love until it’s cheap.
A decision that wasn’t hard to make but hard to follow through on is going to the gym. I’ve recently chose to start going to the gym. I know it’s good for me, but damn it’s hard on my body. I’ve also chosen to stop eating processed foods and fast foods, as well as to start cutting out sugar and other chemicals found in our food today. It was an easy choice but it’s hard to practice it when you’ve been raised to eat junk. (Junk = fast food, boxed foods, lots of processed sweets & sodas) I’ve also chose to start doing more activities outside, walking/hiking, kayaking, & hopefully biking. I’m tired of being tired & sick of being fat. I see photos of myself and I’m amazed at how I look. I HAVE control over that so I’m doing something about it. Unlike some other things in life I don’t have control over.
I'm not giving up completely, there are plenty of old posts to look at if you're desperate :-)
Upstairs are bedrooms, as many as are needed, and another bathroom like the one downstairs- sandy coloured, all golds and blues- with an open glass shower. A big shower, almost a wet room.
The following consists of excerpts from an excellent article by Michael Wagner which may be viewed in its entirety through the link below:
Not only is the CCPA’s broad statement in Deister mere dictum, but the facts in Deister are wholly different from those involving THE LEGEND. A de jure functional product shape can never be a trademark, but a 182-word slogan could be, if used properly. Thus Deister has no relevance to the instant case. In the context of evaluating whether THE LEGEND is perceived by customers as a trademark, the three customer declarations merit consideration -- much more consideration that the backhanded attention accorded by the Board.
The recipe was relatively easy to prepare as everything can be achieved by using a mixing bowl and wooden spoon or spatula. No hand-held mixer needed. Taste wise, it had just the right hint of orange and lemon. Baking this really made me wanna bake this again!
Segment One, Reporter: Cover one Infowars.com story as an on-scene reporter.
And where you will also find us, the Winter family, living a life less ordinary, and a little more self sufficient. It is here that we run an intimate retreat space for those in need of a break.
Eventually.
And of course there is the guilt. There will always be the guilt. Not just the guilt of failing my son, but the guilt that I caused all this. My son is hearing impaired because of something I did. Nothing will ever convince me otherwise. No matter how many doctors or professionals tell me otherwise, I will always know it and it will weigh on my chest every night as I lay in bed at night.
These are from a scene in Robin Hood and as you can see, Robin is drawn very different that the final version. They had a hard time deciding on the final design for Robin and I suspect this is from the first design that Milt created. I like the final design but I think this is more fun.
The Chinese in South Korea number only around 20,000 most of whom hold Taiwanese passport due to the fact that South Korea only established ties with China in 1993. However, the actual total number of Chinese people, including the new immigrants from China since 1993 totals over 600,000! This comprises, workers, students, businessmen, and other long-term residents. Most of these are however not ethnic Chinese but Korean-Chinese from China. Apparently 71% of the over 600,000 Chinese passport holders in South Korea currently are of ethnic Korean descent (China has the world's second largest overseas Korean population, numbering roughly 1.5 million, after the United States, which has the largest overseas Korean population, but in front of Japan, which has the third largest overseas Korean population.)
release from Sri Lanka’s incarceration
Raw Silk Pigment ink by Colorbox
As the 70’s progressed, what made the band so highly rated as musicians and songwriters began to work against them. By 1977 the ‘I Hate Pink Floyd’ punk crowd was growing and the ability to properly sing or play more than three chords became a liability. You were either for Punk Rock or against it, there was no in between. The divide went sometimes unmentioned, but changes in the music industry were happening fast. What started as Punk soon swelled into the safer marketing campaign of New Wave, and when the major labels realized they could actually make money from it, that Tsunami eventually washed a lot of the old guard away. No musician will ever claim that Punk Rock killed their band. That’s too degrading and painful an admission for an accomplished player to even consider. The standard line is always that drugs, women, whiskey, excessive touring or bad management wrecked most bands. Little Feat might deny that the changing musical tide was the reason, but by 1979 a lot of established bands were suddenly directed to park in the Boring Old Fart’s section for the first time. The music industry has always been fixated on what they can sell you today. If they can make a few bucks from the back catalogue, great, but what you’ve done in the past never matters to the corporate bean counters. We need to find a better way to acknowledge musicians’ dedication and perseverance than the current Rock And Roll Hall of Fame, or senseless award shows like The Grammy’s. Too many musicians who didn’t sell millions of records have been ignored. Sales figures have absolutely nothing to do with an artist’s influence and importance to our American musical heritage.
What legal and philosophical representations of women on trial are conveyed in contemporary film, literature and television ? 200-word abstracts by 15 March 2011; Eftihia Mihelakis (eftihia.mihelakis@umontreal.ca) and Daoud Najm (daoud.najm@mail.mcgill.ca).
“I could only pray he’d be the winner of my first year on America’s Got Talent. I’d be so honoured. America’s gonna vote and I think America would vote for him. I do. I really do.”
And he felt even sorrier
Ink: Memento Dye Ink in Rich Cocoa and Potter's Clay
O.M.D. was the anti-punk band of the late seventies who, with Gary Numan and The Human League, spearheaded the synth-pop movement. Melding pop songwriting hooks and commercial-sounding synthesizers, with a simple drum machine keeping an upbeat rhythm, O.M.D. were the next evolutionary step to such 70s bands as Kraftwerk, Roxy Music and Sparks. They had a handful of Top Twenty British singles, including Enola Gay and Electricity, before running out of steam in the late 80’s. Their closest reference is Soft Cell, though minus Marc Almond’s implied decadence. If you absolutely hated Tainted Love, then take a pass on O.M.D., but if, like me, you think Tainted Love was a good pop song that unfortunately got played to death, you’ll probably like Orchestral Maneuvers in the Dark.
Still, he was all I needed
The Fantasy genre needs better ideas and fresh voices. It needs to break the fetters that have been placed upon it by the elite in New York and find its own way again. I am more determined than ever to be one of Fantasy's new voices.
(root_nsu1c308)@/parag/pkgs/vxvm4/4.0/sparc # pkgadd -d . VRTSvxvm
and the soil is extremely rocky.
-Free Hello Kitty Pouch
Guess who had a hangover.
This is what I want (or one image anyway).
A brand, spanking new Canon Rebel T1i. I've already picked out a new strap and fancy purse/bag. I will look pretty darn good toting this bad boy around. Too bad I have yet to figure it out, oh well, I'm having fun learning!
The breathing of the air,
Wonderful words. Thank you, Diane, Linda and Inga!
each have their solution to health care
Teresa MacBain’s husband, Ray MacBain, says he still believes in God but defends his wife’s right not to.
The Arts and Crafts and Aesthetic movements as well as Anglo-Japanese and Art Nouveau styles have their origins in the Victorian era. Historians refer to this group collectively as Victorian decorative arts because of the excessive ornamentation, eclectic reinterpretations of history, and emerging foreign influences of eastern cultures like those of the Middle East and Asia. The curio cabinet also became a popular item as British ships commonly returned from exotic adventures with new collectible treasures.
May 8 - Brgy. Dankias
We're planning a trip to Florida -- actually several trips throughout the winter and early spring -- and the rental car companies really rape you during the Christmas season. A typical car goes for $1100/week!! So we've developed the practice of taking an old car down there in the fall and leaving it until the spring. But this year we didn't get around to it. Jeff's been working crazy hours, so I insisted on taking the car down last weekend.
The term mythology can refer to either the study of myths or a body of myths. For example, comparative mythology is the study of connections between myths from different cultures, whereas Greek mythology is the body of myths from ancient Greece. The term “myth” is often used colloquially to refer to a false story; however, the academic use of the term generally does not pass judgment on its truth or falsity. In the study of folklore, a myth is a symbolic narrative explaining how the world and humankind came to be in their present form. Many scholars in other fields use the term “myth” in somewhat different ways. In a very broad sense, the word can refer to any traditional story.
I wanted you to know that Chen Jie is bonding with Dave just as much as she is bonding with me. Sometimes an adopted child prefers one parent over another in the beginning. So far, that is not happening on our front. Here are some pictures of Chen Jie/Jade-Rose with her Baba (Daddy in Chinese).
We were given no time to say goodbye. The line with my husband and child moved forward with a surge, and my eyes followed them till they disappeared from my view.
The Rotunda
Can you even comprehend the numbers? Billions of people ceasing to live. Billions.
"Look, she hasn't got a dick or anything," he quickly whispered "she's a woman. But she's a man."
I don't know the specifics of Isley's case, nor do I support tax evasion, but isn't keeping a bankable artist locked up for that long going to cost the government lots more money in the long run?
On date five (last night) I met his roommates, and was finally able to let down my guard a little. We kissed in his room, but I'm not sure if I'm crazy about him. How does one know? I don't feel butterflies in my stomach when I'm around him (maybe they're all dead). He is a pretty good looking guy, with kind eyes and a bit of scruff. But I feel like there is definitely something missing. Our interactions feel awkward to me, and at times it feels forced on my end.
Thankfully, I've managed to fit in an entry to the Sugar Bowl before I head for holidays! I've used Catch a Falling Star and coloured her with pro markers and stardust stickles. She hasn't been used for a while but suited a card I was asked to make. I've used First Edition Up, Up and Away papers, which I adore! ( Funnily enough, the title of the papers rather suit the reason for the card too!).
In numerous DTA (Differential Thermal Analysis), and DSC (Differential Scanning Calorimetry) experiments, this double step can be seen as two endothermal (heat-releasing) peaks. In other words, as the temperature was increased, the heat capacity of the material jumped, which resulted in less heating required to increase the temperature. What this also means is that 100% dehydration did not magically occur at 200C (392F). It takes time for the water to completely disperse from the matrix. The second endothermal peak does not bottom out – indicating 100% dehydration - until about 300C (572F).
For that matter, in January please do not ask me if my IUI was successful or not. It might have been but I might be afraid to share the news early on or it might not have been and then you'll just piss me off for being nosy and reminding me that I'm still not pregnant. If I have news I WANT to share I'll do so.
I'm 37 years old today. Is that still the mid-30s or do I have to start saying I'm now in my late 30s?
Fri-AM: 2:11, 2800' ~ Green Mt.
Before I knew it, the years flew by, and it seemed I had very little to show for it. I began to feel trapped by my job, yet I didn't know what else I could do. I wanted more. I wanted a creative outlet. I wanted direction; I wanted purpose. I wanted to commit myself to changing the status quo.
oversized flowers
be that in a pastel shade or slight stitch detail, I have a feeling that
the wave function collapses and possibility becomes actuality. Of
-calligraphy
Well, that and the fact that he could kick my ass with both arms tied behind his back.
Pink Paislee Nantucket Collection (1 sheet each)
I was amazed at our Lamaze class’s granola children that were so ignorant that they paid for the class, but have no intention to use modern medicine at all. I mean if you’re just there for the breathing exercises, save your money and watch a few online tutorials. In fact watch the video on water birth at your home, because you’re not going to get to the hospital in time on your tandem bicycle, YOUR ONLY WAY OF TRANSPORTATION TO THE HOSPITAL. If you want to go the route of natural child-birth, I have no problem with that. That’s awesome you can endure that, and not introduce drugs into the babies already fighting for life body. The fact was that these people didn’t care about the monitors, the medicines (even the ones needed for complications), nor any alternative methods to delivery. Sorry, this may come off as completely crude and discourteous but I’m going to say it anyways. Choosing not to take advantage of modern medicine when its available, is natural selection at its finest.
She then refunded 50% of Edgar’s fee and allowed him to suck on her left nipple for 5 minutes, which he did without making slurping noises. Class, I tell you. Pure class.
With time I reached the age where I didn't care what people thought. I learned to question every bit of "wisdom" and advice thrown my way. Imagine, all those years, all that rubbish and I had no clue. Television, like all things, has a value which is determined by the individual. The aesthetic and psychological value are hard to pin down but, like anything, it is a source of knowledge.
5 Mit Simaen 1:26
Banks possesses a spark I last saw in Amy Winehouse. Something new and ambitious. This woman has managed to snag admirations from the likes of Kanye West as well as some of the top designers in the industry – she was lucky enough to grace the front row seats of London Fashion Week and mingle with the beautiful people of London society comfortably. What impresses me even more is that she really isn’t that good looking. No spite intended, but just like Gaga she is one of those performers whose spunk alone grants them enough sexual appeal to get them by. A LOT of males I have come across have expressed their undying devotion for them and although I don’t agree on an aesthetic level, I certainly do understand why they feel this way.
The cravings have subsided, but I’m already experiencing withdrawal.
3. purchased a refurbished iPod nano to store my music since it's more exercise-friendly.
“I will as soon as he’s done with his homework.” Claire walked upstairs with padded steps.
I used to have nightmares about the possibility of being told he would be coming home in a coffin the last time he deployed -- and we weren't even married! I knew I was his contact and every time a black, official-looking sedan came down the street I prayed it wouldn't pull into my driveway. I dreaded intercom requests for me to come down to the front office where I taught because I was afraid I'd come face to face with a CAO and a chaplain. In a word, just the possibility of him deploying (which seems very likely) leaving me behind in a new place with a new baby and a new job is terrifying. He's been infantry and deployed before and was lucky to walk away with his life. That this time he might not come back, rips my heart in half. Hell, even just getting a casualty notification is enough to put your heart on edge. Pregnancy hormones aren't helping either.
Thursday- 15 miles on one Gu gel (mi.8), 2 S-caps, 4 dried apricots. The fuel was an experiment that didn't work as well as what I usually do - a gel about every 4-5 miles. I was tired in the second half and bribing myself with the reward of eating cookie dough as soon as I finished. Although I didn't actually run into the house and grab the cookie dough, this was definitely a cookie dough eating day. Time: about 2 1/2 hours.
The Dean
Fire Engine by The Molting Vultures
Rule #2: When you get hired into a position you are hired to do a job. The assumption is that you are qualified to do that work and unless you are hired into an internship position where the expectation is that you will be trained on the job. You should be able to perform prior to being patted on the back for completing the work you were hired to do in the first place. Grow up.
There's nothing quite like an impending visit from ones mother that causes me to suddenly see how dirty my house is!
Should the Court wish me to come and give evidence, please feel free to contact me at any time.
*Mocknick Productions Literary Agency, Inc.
After the pictures we finally got to the ferry terminal. Lots and lots of people heading to the same destination- Liberty Island....
11. Hi, what’s a girl like you doing in a nice place like this?
Tides are the rise and fall of sea levels, caused by the combined effects of the gravitational forces exerted by the moon and the sun, and the rotation of the earth. We have two high tides and two low tides each day. The reason for this is to do with the earth moving round the sun and the moon moving round the earth. High tides and low tides relate to the time it takes for these rotations to take place, and the journey from high to low and back again takes approximately twelve hours and twenty five minutes.
The non-football supporting local residents quite rightly do not want to lose their public open space that has been enjoyed by many generations. They would like to see any plan include facilities for recreational activities other than football.
Unfortunately, the above mentioned school accepts students of the seventh grade level, so she has several years to go. This will, however, play to her advantage: giving her time to work, stretch, and refine her abilities. I am excited, and fiercely proud of her. There's just one problem, my baby girl is growing too fast.
So with ourselves now US TV-stars (we saw the show later on TV and you can make out Nabeela’s turquoise top when they pan across the audience – maybe it’s time for me to start wearing brighter clothes??!!). From here we headed off to Macys (anniversary jewellery shopping again) before turning to more important (!) matters, what to eat for our final dinner in New York. So off to one of the kebab carts for a hot dog (moi) and Philly-Steak sandwich (Nabeela). This still left us hungry, so off we went to Kosher Delight again to share a massive portion (12-15) buffalo wings – yummy! Before heading off back to watch ourselves on TV.
While the route will be off-limits for motorized vehicles, there will be soft closures where you’ll be asked to stop to allow cross traffic to get through. Those soft closures will be staffed by hundreds of volunteers who want you to have fun and be safe while they assist folks who are trying to get by in their vehicles. Help those volunteers by stopping when they ask you to. Take a second to say thanks.
we would walk towards house number 13, where we would share our food
1/4 cup grade B maple syrup
Therefore, in addition to excitement, we must maintain a certain level of rationality as the world economy is not yet completely out of the shadows, particularly the outbreak of debt crisis in European countries. Consistency is the most pragmatic way to face the unknown future.
Although the London market is buoyant in the sense prices continue to rise and there is funding available for purchases, it remains a concern that NAMA is selling its best assets now which might otherwise have appreciated more in coming years, compared with declines in its own backyard.
By Nicholas Contompasis
The Sleepwalker’s Tree
All the trembling sweetness
Today’s hike began with a half mile walk through the neighborhood to reach the trailhead on Lincoln Street (not visible on the map at the link provided, but our access was a little left (west) of what is shown there). Following along the edge of the creek on the Whatcom Creek Trail, Lower Gulch Trail and Waterline Trails until we reached the falls, then we turned around and headed back.
(b) to reorganize the Government of the Commonwealth including the determination of the order of precedence of the heads of the Executive Departments:
The gates were locked. The lights were out. No one (other than the Johns driving past, looking at me like I was a hooker who had wandered into the broad daylight) was around. There was nobody anywhere.
Life is so funny. You just never know what your skills will have you doing in the future; therefore, don’t consider your abilities as NOTHING. Do it with passion and as if you’re the only one doing it. Having stated that little bit, let me introduce you to the RussiAmerica: 2 Sides 1 World vol. 1 Project. Whom would have ever thought a black guy from South West Atlanta, Georgia and a Caucasian guy from Petropavlovsk-Kamchatsky (Russia) would come all the way from our native land, to Beijing, China and hook to up to do hip hop music? Now how weird, eccentric and awesome is that. Do and can I speak Russian? NO! However, I promised my good…I guess I could say she’s something like a mother (Ariel Lurye) that I will learn Russian. So….PRIVET! hahaha
Eyes not seeing
Julius Rosenwald, an American clothier, became part-owner ofSears, Roebuck and Company in 1895, and eventually served as its president from 1908 to 1922, and chairman of its Board of Directors until his death in 1932.He became interested in social issues, especially education for African Americans, and provided funding through Dr. Booker T. Washington of the Tuskegee Institute, a historically black college (HBCU), prior to founding the fund....
Dearest Le Artiste,
This week was totally crazy and, as such, I knew I wouldn't be able to run on Thursday. Meaning I knew in advance I would only get in a minimum of 3 runs this week. And, to be honest, I didn't even know if I'd manage to squeeze in a run on Tuesday! But, I did and even though the Garmin flaked out (or possibly we experienced some user error) I did at least 3 miles.
On a personal note, I have experienced some of the same type of direct interference from the darkness and am no stranger to the magic and sorcery. Once somebody understands what they want to manifest or accomplish, they must next find the most direct way to ensure that their negative energy – or entity - arrives on-site is able to fulfill its mission. It takes a minimal of training to learn how to effectively utilize constructed beings known as servitors or tulpas . Check out this site which claims that they can teach anybody how to create and command a genie or jinn. Once closely guarded by the rich and powerful, these occult techniques are now available to the general public but seldom contain all of the keys. There are also numerous texts written by many enlightened practitioners throughout the ages that detail how to interact with demonic entities and essentially get them to work for you. Add to that a zealot’s fervor that one is doing the will of God and you have the makings of evil incarnate and a possible host to demonic entities who has little or no respect for the sanctity of life.
New members badge for next season. Probably a new ordinary badge as well. And maybe another scarf.
- tights (because it’s f*cking cold)
Corn flour mix with little water to thicken gravy
We all have unfulfilled desires. Many spiritual environments become a feeding ground for these, where practitioners may be wearing flowing clothes and chanting prayers, but feeling inwardly tied in knots. Wanting is insidious and we must be aware of it - whether we are in the office, following our creative voice, practicing bendy poses on our yoga mats, or exploring sexuality in our bedrooms.
Tales of the grid breaking down in such a thoroughgoing way seem to be the one illustration of the vulnerability of our complex global systems that policymakers can at least understand. Last year, the U.S. House of Representatives passed a bipartisan bill that would have begun to address the U.S. grid's weaknesses. But, the Senate failed to act. The House was in part reacting to a 2008 National Academy of Sciences report. The House bill has been reintroduced, but prospects for its passage are uncertain.
Still let reason sway, And cling to hope:
Happy birthday to my beautiful girl!
1) Improved Speed Development
· Work on the Ambit My Money (e-banking) software development team designing, developing, and testing the software applications for mobile devices.
I enlisted in a group in New York called New York City Social Sports. A man I dated last summer told me about it and how it had changed his life. He posts about it on Facebook nearly constantly and was religious about going to his games. It’s a good concept really (similar to my beloved Pac-12 summer softball league). You sign up for a team, you play, you go out for drinks afterwards. Fun! Although it ended up defeating the purpose of my New Year’s Resolution, as we typically spent more time drinking low-quality beer instead of actually being physically active. Darn you alcohol, you’ve bested me once again.
Cast all your worries upon him because he cares for you.
For marine use, you’ll want to select a soap that will be tough on dirt, grime, salt and fish blood, yet easy on the environment. Don’t use the same soap you would for cleaning dishes at home. Instead, select an effective, biodegradable cleaning agent with a neutral pH factor. If you use your craft in salt water, it’s especially important to use soap and fresh water to completely remove the corrosive salt build-up that can eat away at your boat. Be sure to follow the written instructions on the cleaning product regarding dilution and general usage. Be aware that certain “super concentrated” detergents may not be suitable for your boat, as these cleansers can strip away and damage finishes when left on for extended periods of time.
I took a wee detour on the way home and marveled at the strange and pretty roads I’d never traveled. It struck me that The Road Not Taken might be an apt description for not only my summer travels, but the journey I’ve been on.
While driving this morning to drop off Junior (3) I thought about my kid’s eating habits. Actually, it was Junior asking for a “snack” and J (11) giving him fruit snacks and a sucker at 7:00 am that made me think about my kid’s eating habits.
Later in the day, visitors were offered choices of cheeseburgers, chicken tenders, hot dog and curly fries, egg salad or peanut butter and jelly sandwiches.
I was taught never to believe a single word that is written in the papers, and nothing except what is written in the Icelandic Sagas ... Ugla also speaks words that clearly come straight from Halldór Laxness himself:
Water your seeds as well as planting a lot more. When you sign somebody up, that’s fantastic, that’s what you want. But don’t just forget about them whilst you search for more. Obtain the ball rolling together whilst keeping the momentum proceeding. You’re truly investment in your outcomes and accomplishment as time passes.
Ready to see how it turned out?!
I thank Kurt Cobain for blessing the world with his amazing talent. I thank him for making me feel less alone. That helped a lot. I don't know exactly how to thank him for showing me what I needed, or even if I should. The way he did it was so terrible. I dearly wish both of us could have gotten help, and lived to know what a good day feels like.
He looked up at me and gave his usual reply, “Yeah, Mom.”
5)Are you planning on doing any preparedness events in europe or even back in America? My GF and I are Gearing up for a big trip in the next year or so after we get school loans paid off and I would love to see the european side of preparedness.
When mama was in Miriam, it was called Maryknoll. The American nuns who ran the school did not allow the girls to have sewing and cooking classes because they felt that it contradicted the school’s mission vision on women empowerment. The nuns let the college students smoke on the roof of their dormitories. They were that liberal for an all-girls Catholic school.
The packaging on this doesn't lie. It literally dries your polish in less than a minute! I usually paint my nails and give them about an hour to set on their own, then swipe a coat of this over them and ta-da! Dry nails! It leaves them nice and shiny and pretty too... and it helps your polish last for days. I'm not even kidding you - my nails have stayed shiny and unchipped for a good 5 days. No idea what is in this stuff, but it's basically the best ever.
Transfer your plant to a larger pot.
1 tsp. powdered sage
Hall of Fame, New York Yankee great, Yogi Berra once said, “It ain’t over until it’s over.” That certainly is absolutely true about taxes. It is a continuing saga. Although the tax season is officially over for 2011 returns, “now what” is a question you might be asking yourselves right about now. Tax planning is still critical even after that 2011 return was electronically sent or dropped in the mail.
JT - Just to be clear, have either of the bidders said to the SPL, well look then, if we come back in as a newco, what would the board be likely to do. Would it be likely to impose further sanctions? Would they give us the licence back or not? They must have asked.
He pulled himself together, stood up straight and raised his hat
LA MAI COFFEE: THE WORLD'S BEST TASTING ACT OF KINDNESS
My favourite poet? Ooh – that’s not fair. I’d have to say Carol Anne Duffy, but I like lots of others too. My favourite illustrators are E H Shepard and Quentin Blake because their pictures always make me feel happy inside.
There are many ways to mask, and some I know I haven't mentioned but this is a good list to get started with. Now that we've talked about how to mask, let's see how to effectively use a mask. Color Sequence is very important. As the frisket quote mentions, we need to plan what areas we are leaving white, what areas we color first then cover up, and what will be darkest or lightest. This is the part that will take more practice and I don't think I'll get into spray sequence much today because I want to show something else.
The snow so red, I bleed. His tawny lore
of countless lifetimes
P.S. I really had been begging for a new toilet... we'll technically we need to replace two, but I'll take what I can get! :) And no, perhaps not the most "romantic" gift I've ever received, but practical has its merits too!
"Have you ever even kissed anyone?"
'We object to this ruling and do not believe any copyright infringement took place, a view we intend to express legally ... At this point, we believe any impact on company earnings will be limited'.Further proceedings on the merits were brought by Mercis Media, whilst Sanrio filed a counter claim seeking the Miffy trade mark to be removed from the register.
compound, they bounded the
So a while back I felt like someone used my blog as a marketing ploy and I was really turned off for a long time to writing in this blog. Especially because I felt like she told me that if I joined this group that she led I wouldn't have to deal with any of the things that I've been writing about anymore. And for some reason this just made me want to stop sharing for a while. Almost like everything that I write about and have been going through is bad and could be fixed and I don't feel that way. I feel like what I go through is life and it happens and somedays I feel amazing about myself and some days not so much... and I don't want any of that to be labeled in any way other than "normal"... whatever that is!!
And today, I am feeling some of that fire.
Incarnate's idea that there are no such thing as "new souls"--there are only the million that have been reincarnated for five thousand years--was a fascinating idea. It held amazing potential, but it just wasn't there yet. The writing needed work. The main character, Ana, needed more development. It was a story held up only by the setting and atmosphere rather than the characters.
- Pinch salt
So that is it for this one. Quick and Simple to do since I worked with beautiful elements and they can all stand on their own. All I had to do was combine and glue!
Elegant, yet still girlish. I might have to live in that room. I love it already.
The New Testament is written/remembered in a form of Greek called the Koline greek which was popular around the time of Alexander. It is believed the entire Greek new testament was in manuscript form by 1st century AD (CE).
We are staying in an area called Bo Kaap, a very colourful area indeed. But the place is lovely. It is called Wale Lodge in Wale street. We had a very quiet un-eventful day today. A little tired. We plan on doing the red and blue bus tours over the next 2 days. I am excited to explore. Although, I would love to explore this area a little.
It's so very touching that 5 adorable teddy bears will be donated to hurting families and that Genesis will have her part in bringing them comfort. To see the post on Laken Bear's site, Please visit this link.
3. Show up and do the work. Be on time for the sessions. Engage with the teacher. Make mistakes, then correct them. Repeat. Take notes. And most importantly, do the homework. Do it several times if you can manage the time to.
Working Out… I am still working out… thank goodness! My mile splits are slower than they ever have been, but I can still run about 4 miles. I am also still teaching my class on Sundays at the Y and trying to stay as active as I can. My workouts aren’t as hard, but that’s okay… at leas that is what I try to tell myself.
Recollections Cardstock
After wiping down the chalkboard, I played around on it a few minutes (it was getting pretty late at this point) but didn't like it so I got this little heart up. If I make a huge mess of the board with my experimental drawings and writings, I'll just wipe it off with a wet cloth and repeat the conditioning steps to have a clean-er surface to play around with.
Alamaro, M., Emanuel, KA, McGillis, W.: “Experimental Investigation of Air-Sea Transfers at High Wind Speed,” forthcoming in Journal of Fluid Mechanics.
And I was easy prey. I was all soft, white underbelly in those days.
Marty: "...but your kids are gonna love it."
He said to his girl, as he gave her a twirl,
Wow–this is an absolutely beautiful day! The sun is shining, but it’s not too warm. The water is nice and flowing, but not too quickly. This might just be the best day of my life. The only thing that could possibly make this better would be if food magically appeared from above.
“The Law of the Lord stands opposed to the ‘counsel of the wicked’ (1), to which it is ultimately the only answer. The psalm is content to develop this one theme, implying that whatever really shapes a man’s thinking shapes his life.” (48)
- Both babies successfully took an entire bottle by mouth on Friday (and received Sip Sip Hooray certificates to prove it).
She even engineered our run to hit the Lakeshore path, which is something I haven’t been good about this time around.
Luckily I have the movies to turn to when I need to escape. Most of the few friends I had have gone since my life started turning bad, but also because I have been really poor in terms of maintaining my friendships. Deep down I am still not allowing myself to be happy for who I am and what I have. That must be it, or maybe it isn’t. Perhaps it don’t even matter what it is as long as there is something to blame for every misfortune that happens to find me.
I want them all.
I believe there are a number of areas that the TTC (or, as stated, other transit authorities) could fix towards having a better rider experience and superior consumer engagement. In the first four posts there were ideas on signage and wayfinding, of expanding the colour-code system and of totally utilizing myriad digital delivery methods.
What are the dates of the challenge?
and several other local and international ngos
Meanwhile, here are our family photos from the month of April. Click on Steven’s taped up face to enjoy!
From the mid 80′s well into the 1990′s a sports fan would have been able to put together a fairly decent autograph collection via the mail. It was a very common practice for most sports stars to oblige their fans by signing autographs through the mail.
“It wasn’t your fault. You—. I—. Damn. Shelby, I’ve—.”
National Executive Director
And on the back porch, the purslane which lives in a protected spot, continues putting out these pretty little blooms.
It’s hard writing this. I haven’t finished the song. The thoughts are disjointed and I’m partly suspicious of writing about the whole process – it can be crippling and disturbing to the flow to do so. I’ve also been reading and listening to a lot of recent Leonard Cohen interviews and he is VERY suspicious and cautious about discussing the so-called mechanics of writing. Doing so can stop you from writing another word ever again…
Now why would a self-publish author face more heat and disrespect from fellow artist who seek to trash and destroy? Well, the grand excuse for Publishers and some Author is that Self-Publishers will ruin the art and destroy the business… is that right? Well, I’ve seen some self-pub film makers and bands step into the circle and actually help boost the art value of their field. And yes, the bands without a label, the film maker without a company who post their own content are just as the Self-Published author. They’re going it alone, without a brand, trying to make their work stand out of the herd. Do I hear anyone cast stones, no, they welcome it with open arms.
Stick your photo on the right of the layout. Here comes the fun fussy cuttings from Basic Grey papers, with all kinds of hearts, fllowers, arrows and butterflies.... stick those cute cutting above and below your photos to create a fun stream of fussy cuts :) add a bit of brad and twine if you are wanting for an extra cuteness and dimension.
Dance with me my beloved
“I’m going to listen”.
1x Barclay's Russian Stout, brewed in 1966,
When we had to move away, I was sad to leave all of our friends behind, and you were such a source of comfort to me. First, D helped us move a U-Haul truck of stuff up north. (Do you remember that crazy time? Our guys spent 8 hours driving to our rental house, 2 hours trying to get a key from the rental agent, and then 1 hour unloading the entire contents of the truck into the house itself. It was a wonder they made the plane to come home!) What a blessing his help was. And yours—A. was so little at the time, and B., and I was so grateful that you and D. could sacrifice that time to help us. Then when we moved, I was really lonely. Sometimes when you move, people fall out of your life—you probably know how this can happen. It’s hard to keep relationships going, and it’s a testament to you, Kim, that so many people stay in touch with you—you have lived so many places, and collected wonderful friendships everywhere along the way!
Similarly, the French issued an ultimatum, which was presented in Berlin at 1230, saying France would be at war unless a 1700 deadline for the troops’ withdrawal was adhered to.
As Faku was speaking ANC Motherwell branch secretary Zola Mayedwa approached a Herald reporter and advised him to hide his notebook.
The following information must be submitted with your application to ensure prompt
Mother Gladys came from Toronto Zoo while her father Elmer moved from Mulhouse Zoo in France.
I am super psyched that the last day of the work week is FINALLY here! It was definitely a long week!
Silas is a handsome little boy with brown hair and big brown eyes. He is affectionate and has a glowing personality. He is engaging, alert, and aware. He was born with CP and all of his limbs are affected by the spasticity. he has also has strabismus, which could be corrected with surgery. He is not able to walk, but will truly blossom in a loving family who can provide therapy and encouragement for his progress.
Let’s be honest: John Barrowman isn’t a great actor. He is, however, a great screen presence, and aspects of his personality have been used over the years to help create Jack. On the other hand, Eve Myles is one hell of an actress, and she gets to do stuff with Gwen in Miracle Day that it feels as though she’s been waiting for years to do. Here she’s not someone with whom to fuck, and even Jack learns that. She’s gone far past being the student. She’s his equal, and just as adept at deciphering the cruel way the universe operates as he. On the watch of Miracle Day, Gwen Cooper has become every bit the central figure that Jack Harkness is. If, for whatever unfathomable reason, Barrowman wasn’t available, or no longer wanted to do the show (hey, the thought was prefaced with “unfathomable”), at this point Torchwood could easily continue on with Gwen as the central figure.
- Indonesian chicken curry
It's putting your faith in God. Completely. You have no other choice. You have been completely
“Only by following these principles, we can actually turn ourselves into love!
Back to Home Ed one last time; Denise was a great advocate of autonomous HE, and when her eldest son decided to give school a try she jokingly worried about having to deal with curriculum stuff as she prepared to take him for a look round the school. It gave her a great deal of pleasure a little while after he’d started school and was doing exceptionally well, that the teachers were confounded by how N could excel in science having never had a *structured lesson* in the subject! I also remember the pride with which she told me about some of R’s encounters with so called experts, and she was of course super proud of daughter K too.
We do have the draft of the house plans done. We have figured out the electrical issues (wind and solar), and we are in the process of either finding someone to dig the well or renting the equipment to dig it ourselves. My wife has also sent the house plans to someone to verify where we can put the sewer and leech field. We are making progress. Lots of progress.
Bully does what documentaries at their best often do, they hold up a mirror to the cultures we live in and are surrounded by—and what we see is not always pretty.
“When Williams speaks of ‘silent waiting on the truth, pure sitting and breathing in the presence of the question mark’, we laugh because we read it through rational spectacles.”
sliced jalapenos
Long before I started trying to eat healthily or getting fit meat was always a staple part of my diet but, in reality it probably consisted mainly of chicken and the odd piece of beef when my parents cooked a roast dinner. I was never that keen on steak – I would always have salmon rather than steak – and whilst I have always enjoyed meat, a full varied meat-eating diet wasnt a high priority. To be honest, I was kind of sick of the sight of chicken we had it so often!
Germany 11-11-2008
This statement might be a little over exaggerated but I was pissed.
Following on from my earlier posts on the editing structure of slasher films, this week I have a draft of a paper that combines my early observations (much re-written) along with an analysis of the relationship between editing and the narrative structure of Friday the Thirteenth (1980)
Here’s what you do…
If employees always have the option of quitting because of a social safety net, then employment conditions are guaranteed to be better than being on the safety net. The existence of the welfare option means that employees would only take a job if they find it better than the safety net.
Now the story of the beautiful day and everything clicking in the morning. Reason for the story is to continue to focus on the good throughout the week and everyday. Why wake up grumpy and mad at the world, when you can wake up happy? Life is to short to focus on bad thoughts of the day before, it’s in the past now and we are in the present to move forward in life.
The shot above is of a stretch of the river running from the O2 arena ('the Dome' for oldies) on the right, to the edge of the Greenwich Yacht Club on the left. It was taken standing outside of the Greenwich Peninsula Ecology Centre (click any photo to enlarge).
Penstemon strictus (Rocky Mountain Penstemon)
The proof of his false teaching is constant throughout his book, deviating from scripture and replacing words in scripture with the word ‘honor’ to support the teachings in his book. (eg. replacing words like blessing, time, praise, esteem, submit with honor). This is not how you treat the teachings of God. This ‘man of grace’ starts attacking the gospel of grace. Bevere says,
I am so grateful to be feeling better and to NOT need surgery!!
If you think this might be right for you, try them for a risk-free 14-day trial. They even have a 24/7 hosting support.
In fact at this point, he should be racking up victories and stock piliung cash to use in the general Election.
Friends of my kids who lived here in town once and now come only to visit
As I get more and more into the jubilee spirit, I also love the patriotic design on the bottle. Super cute, and made me think of British summertime, Wimbledon, bowler hats, deck chairs, and of course, strawberries and cream.
i have been dreaming about home decor.
In the Honeybee Bakery—named after Lucy’s cat—Katie notices that her aunt is adding mysterious herbs to her recipes. Turns out these herbal enhancements aren’t just tasty—Aunt Lucy is a witch and her recipes are actually spells!
Thanks, Jim, for giving me the okay to post this poem. As I've seen from the recent closed colloquium, incest is still one of the great unspeakables.
More information, video’s and course dates to follow
Gillian McMuury http://starlitstudio.typepad.com It has lots of great ideas for making gifts and cards. I have about 30 blogs that I read daily so it has been very hard to come up with just one. But right now I have been loving the projects on StarLitStudio.
A not on shotgun terminology; as with wire gauge, the smaller the gauge, the larger the diameter of the bore size. Shotgun gauge is also sometimes referred to as "bore", which was a measurement dating back to old blackpowder cannons. In this context refers not directly to diameter, but to the number of pure lead spheres of the diameter of the barrel that would fit into a pound of lead. So a 12 bore or 12 gauge shotgun has a bore diameter equal to that of a sphere of lead that weighs 1/12th pound; which corresponds to about .72". A 10ga that of a 1/10th pound lead sphere which is about .77" and so on.
I have a nephew who told my wife last night that he was stressed out from spending so much time practicing baseball that he needed a break. This kid is only 7. He should not have stress in his life from a leisure activity. He pushes himself hard to impress his dad and win his affection. I have seen his dad inadvertently bully him into eating olives, so I can only imagine the pressure he is going through over baseball. If a kid can put this much stress on himself for something that is a choice, what are these kids going to be doing when they are worried about either being hit by their parents or living in a state of disapproval.
I had a lot to catch up on, because of a new admission to 63. He showed up on the unit around 1800, but was immediately whisked off to dialysis before I had a chance to do any assessment beyond "He's alive, A&Ox3, and doesn't look like he should be in the hospital." He came back to the unit around 2130. I did my admission sheet, got him dinner, and brought him his (late b/c of dialysis) meds in record time, done around 2230. He was doing just fine all through it.
More fun projects to come...
Paper: Recollections White and Kraft Cardstock, SEI Black Orchid
Yes, the A-Z in April Challenge is over. But I’m going to try to finish it; I kind of got stuck on “K” but I shall power through!
And when the Good achieve victory they immediately go about healing the wounds inflicted by the usurpers.
Crazy Lying.
I Caught Myself – Paramore
"All through my training, I was told how brave and skilled the Gifted of Federas were." He sat up again, folded his arms. "Rissad had it worse, being a Gatemaker. Before your time, of course, but your predecessor was a hero to us."
Yes, there was the odd cyclist here and there who donned a cowboy hat and jeans. A tandem cycling couple dressed in jeans, cowboys hats and shirts arrived and left one of the community breakfasts.
-kick to the back of the head of Punk for another 2.
He replied, “Don’t lie to me. I looked on the map and Florida is a very thin state.”
A few people asked if I had tattoos on my legs! Um, no. These nylons are by Voila! and the regular price was $25.99 - I paid $5.99 which is way more reasonable, considering they popped a toe on the way to work. Arg!
blue, purple, green & white...
I love the rockets used as panel breaks to the page and the cheerful faces on them and the title panel is delightful..
French’s Save $.75/1 Honey Mustard or Honey Mustard dipping sauce (5/31)
As a mom, I’m always looking for healthy alternatives to old favorites. While not a dramatically long list, I’ve tried chickpea cookies, almond flour cake, golden flaxseed meal pancakes, and now coconut flour brownies. Why coconut flour? It’s gluten-free, high in fiber, and high in protein. And, I found a recipe on the back of the Let’s Do…Organic bag (why not try it, right?). The original was too dry for my family so I changed a few things for more moisture. If you want more good stuff, add 2 tablespoons of chia seeds for a nice dose of Omega-3. It will have bits of crunch but still hold a good chocolate flavor. Finally, as you’ll notice, there’s only a few ingredients so be selective when chooosing cocoa powder and chocolate chunks.
You apologise and atone.
The judge in the case, Mr Justice Peter Charleton, today ruled in the Commercial Court division of the High Court that a stay be placed on “entry of orders” against Moritz to pay €172m for three months, expiring June 28th, 2012. Moritz had consented to the judgments so the stay just extends the period NAMA must wait to get its hands on Moritz’s assets. Moritz successfully argued that the stay would preserve jobs and interestingly, give Moritz the opportunity to maximise the potential of its assets for NAMA’s benefit. However the Judge did not accept all of Moritz’s arguments and reportedly held that NAMA had acted reasonably and within its powers in challenging the stay.
Campground living is still going wonderfully. We had a nice weekend here this weekend with all of the old campground folks around. We did some campfire drinking, played some cards, and just relaxed. We floated in the river for a good chunk of time on Sunday which is the ultimate lazy sunday activity. It pretty much involves tossing a tube in the river, tying yourself to an anchor so you don't get swept away, and closing your eyes. Heavenly! We're looking forward to a trip to NH this weekend for a wedding and possibly a brief trip to winnipesauke...more later.
& Italian postcards
I have SO much going on - last week on Wednesday, we got our first foster doggie in, his name is 'Appleton'
If you are not sure if someone is a friend or not,read: Who are my real friends? Part 1.
Thinking twice about taking the $1 bus to DC this weekend? Well, I would be too. Two buses had accidents as a result of their drivers falling asleep at the wheel.
L: Sure, sometimes, but it's not like they follow me home or anything.
If you have items that you don’t use, but are in good condition, they are prime candidates to sell or donate. Gather all of these items together in boxes or plastic bags.
Savasana - Corpse Pose
2 Corinthians 4:7 But we have this treasure in earthen vessels, that the surpassing greatness of the power may be of God and not from ourselves; NAS
We also want to thank our friends with the Austin Powder Company, McDonalds of Wellston and McArthur and R & C Quick Stop for sponsoring the prizes. We could not have done it without all of them.
I had bumped into Chris Brogan in the supermarket, buying afore mentioned wine, and introduced myself to him so when he saw me asking for the glass he asked me to join them! It was such a great opportunity so I jumped at it but not before I gave them a clear ‘get-outta-jail’ offer that I would leave them be if they were talking business!
What we need is a bit of colourful inspiration to get us going on a Tuesday, don’t you think? A pretty picture, beautiful scenery or colourful imagery. Yup, that’ll liven up Tuesdays and turn it into a terrific day!
My mind needs visual stimulation to engage. (Go figure that one!) But the fact of the matter is – about a third of the world’s population are ‘visual’ people. And if a third of the world’s population are visual, and if they are anything like me and refuse to look at a book unless it engages my visual mind – then the authors who wrote those books are missing out on a massive readership. The books could be bloody fantastic for all I know. But since they aren’t capturing my attention, then I’m not looking at them. No… I’m off looking at some other book with a pretty cover – maybe even a book that could possibly be the crappiest read I have ever picked up.
color and tie off.
1 small cooking pumpkin, peeled and cut into 1-inch chunks (or one 15-oz can of pumpkin)
and as you may have noticed, the flowers from Salute have made a showing, I need to restrain myself...
Beauty of make up products
if you care and provide for the least of these,
Me: Me too!
I can not show you any pictures of it now, I took the front off to work on that, now the shop is a little dusty......
My poker friends got us champagne flutes (Kate Spade! And they say "Mr" on one and "Mrs" on the other! So cute!!!) and a bottle of my favorite champagne (Veuve Cliquot in case you're wondering)
The healing power of Jesus’ love and word is an instrument of healing that we too can share as Christians. We experience a cleansing power in the sacrament of absolution and experience of the Eucharist. As we see our healing mission as disciples, we too can spread the light of God’s healing love.
Image : Kind courtesy Google
The original post was only going to be about the proposed restraining order that the CPS were applying for. Alas! Life she isn’t that simple, or nice really, she likes throwing more than one rotting cunt flap at you in one go. I’ll get to that bit in a minute, I just want to comment on the proposed restraining order. It’s not going to be a lengthy analysis, just important points that I want to make.
NM
3. Philosophy Hope in a Tinted Moisturizer with SPF 20, $38
If you are a woman you turn invisible - Mercedes.
I love Kenny K images and have decided to make this my first candy. Up for grabs is $15 gift certificate for Kenny K Downloads.
- 2-Pack
The meticulously cut vintage chandelier crystals of this simple cross twinkle in stark and beautiful contrast to the rough frame of aged solder that binds them. An unearthed vessel of vintage glass donning a heavy patina serves as a beautiful pedestal in this lovely juxtaposition of rustic elegance.
I wonder where he goes on vacation…
Frederic Robinson Limited Old Tom
We return home. There’s another person there, a woman. She has a familiar scent – it’s similar to Mom’s scent. Must be a relative.
Seven MEME Questions have to be Answered as well…
"As a communist I don’t believe in heaven or the Bible but as a scientist I now believe in hell," said Dr. Azzacove. "Needless to say we were shocked to make such a discovery. But we know what we saw and we know what we heard. And we are absolutely convinced that we drilled through the gates of Hell!"
It occurs to me that I’ve not done a sampling for Guinness Extra Stout. I’ll do one later. Meantime, here’s one for the Rogue Irish Lager.
We know that an extraordinary display of human and fire power is already in the area and that drills are a daily routine, therefore I vividly ask all parties to go for the Grand Bargain.
A few weeks ago I published an ebook with Amazon. It was a pleasure. The instructions on their website were clear. Once I had it formatted, it took just a few minutes to upload it and then just a few hours for it to appear in the Amazon store.
The Scriven people are brilliant, mad, and dead. All except for one…
My books are above in the header. Overprotected, Nailed, Magic Hands, Falling for Romeo, A Season of Eden and The Heavenly series. The Heavenly covers in the header are for the hardcovers. I only offer paperback through the giveaway, for reasons of expense.
Today some of the Verve Divas are hopping and celebrating a new Easter set in the Verve Store! It's called Hoppy Easter and it is available now! It's an adorable little set that we hope you love as much as we do.
“Wonderful,” I responded. “Thank you so much.”
An unscheduled, impromptu reading in a dark bar by one of America’s greatest poets was a treat to the limited few that were present. His methodical and dark verse haunted the air. Also, if you haven’t read his book on Edward Hopper, shame on you.
Shellabarger doing his thang at IL State Uni, from TimeOut Chicago
See, I originally wanted a Strawberry Blonde Lemonade, supposedly a Gladstones favorite. Michael made a face, and promptly suggested something better: the Blackberry Margarita. Perfectly sweet, and perfectly alcoholic. Now that was a drink!
Following that, he joined a band called Seagull that started off doing covers but gradually worked originals into their set. They gigged all over the midlands in the UK for a few years, and then punk hit. John joined a group which was oddly enough called Six Pistons. Doing mostly fun punk-influenced rock, the project was short-lived following the departure of the drummer and singer. So bassist Ash Aisthorpe brought in an old drummer acquaintance named Mick Freer. This new three piece group with John, Ash and Mick called themselves The Classics.
Settimi L, Spinelli A, Lauria L, Miceli G, Pupp N, Angotzi G, Fedi A, Donati S, Miligi L, Osborn J, Figa-Talamanca I. Spontaneous abortion and maternal work in greenhouses. Am J Ind Med 2008; 51: 290-295.
blossoms swelled, died and fell
The other looked up from the board and asked: ‘Have the patterns on the board stopped telling you their secrets?’
"Search me, O God, and know my heart; try me and know my anxious thoughts; and see if there be any hurtful way in me, and lead me in the everlasting way" (Psalm 139:23-24 NASB).
I still have several more years of payments before that money frees up again. Since I'm having trouble budgeting in groceries, a spanking vacation is totally out of the realm of possibility.
I woke up after nine and realized that Addy was supposed to be at playgroup at nine. So I jumped out of bed, threw on some clothes and raced her over to playgroup, getting there a half hour late. When I dropped her off I was really impressed with the mom doing playgroup that day. I had never been to this friend's house for playgroup before and she totally went all-out. She had set up some play tents, had dress-ups out for the girls to play in and even had a few extra kids there. Hmmmm, maybe I should consider stepping it up a bit when it's my turn. It wasn't until I returned to pick Addy up at 11:30 and she had a party bag and foam crown that I connected that it was a birthday party. We had received an invitation to a birthday party (that was planned to coincide with playgroup so all of the playgroup girls could come) and I had totally spaced it. No RSVP, no gift. Yikes. Good thing I got *so much* work done on the computer while Addy was gone (while Jackson sat on my lap sticking his hand in front of the computer screen, pushing buttons or pulling on my arms). The party was a rousing success, as evidenced by the ginormous fit that Addy threw when she had to take off her princess dress to leave.
Anyway, I haven't posted for a few days but I haven't been totally remiss. I've been thinking of good things for each day -- just not writing them down.
The little bits I tried to enjoy were fabulous. Pete & I had a date night on Friday. We stayed at the Foshay hotel, saw the Lion King at the Orpheum theater, and had dinner at a fancy steakhouse, Manny's.
So, now you know the rest of the story in terms of our choices on baby’s name.
This is the item that made me realise why Edward Bess is such a cult favorite =)
...wonderful owners...very welcoming...they were so
Flowers come into full bloom and corn is ready to plant. Also called the Corn Planting Moon and the Milk Moon. Some call it the Dyad moon, (the Latin word for a pair) refers to the twin stars of the
His rehab has been going great though. The leg looked great after the trip and looked great after a fairly involved ride yesterday. Let's just hope that it keeps going this well!
You can find them in your local craft store in the aisle with the vase fillers. They are used for vase fillers and they release water over time and are useful for watering flowers if you go on vacation. But... today we are not using them as vase fillers. We are using them for sensory play!
Brewday went as smoothly as I could hope despite it being my bright idea to brew in the middle of a heat-wave. Luckily I had some of Dogfish Head's Festina Peche in the fridge to remedy that. After 14 days fermentation seemed to be complete so this baby is now racked and I'm dry-hopping for the first time. I've gotten a lot better at being patient with my brewing but I'm still anxious as all hell to try this. The sample I tried when racking seemed to be on track with what I was expecting which is always reassuring.
Is it really Tuesday again?
Not all Victorian characters were paragons of virtue (not even the Old Queen herself), and “A Real Rogue: Joseph Anderton” was a prime example of roguery. Moreover, he was also the (now) City of Barrie’s first mayor, and so you can draw your own conclusions on that. Oh, and like modern politicians, he got away with it.
*Makes bland foods such as oatmeal, wheat, rice and flour more appetizing
For a short time in the spring, Yellowstone National Park opens the roughly 50-mile section of road between park headquarters in Mammoth Hot Springs, Wyo., and West Yellowstone only to bicyclists, walkers or rollerbladers. Given the variety of wildlife, the scarcity of vehicles and the sweeping vistas of snowy mountains, waterfalls and boiling thermal features, it has to be one of the most incredible and unusual bicycle rides in the United States, if not the world.
295 3. “Presidential Prerogatives and Civil Suits, Indictments, and Impeachment.” Chicago Daily Law Bulletin, February 24, 1998, p. 2. (Incorporated in Item C-1998(6), below, p. 7. See, also, Chicago Sun-Times, February 25, 1998, p. 40 (abridged).)
So what’s my plan? I thought about where I wanted to visit, what I wanted to do..etc And I wanted to make my experience a little more worthwhile than just being a tourist. Hence, I signed up to do some voluntary work in addition to visiting all that the breathtaking continent has to offer. Ecuador wasn’t initially on my travel plan, but what better way to visit one of the most stable countries in South America, than to help teach the indigenous children of the country? Unfortunately, I won’t be able to visit the Galapagos, for which Ecuador is famous for, due to time and financial reasons. After this short experience, I will visit Peru, Bolivia, Argentina and finish in Brazil. It will be wonderful to discover the beauty of South America, but more than that, I hope it will also be a journey of self discovery.
She said: “It has been causing a lot of concern, not just to the Government but also to an awful lot of members of the public. By the summer we will have in place new immigration rules which I believe will end that abuse.”
I ended up taking down pretty much every bit of it – the crown had to come down anyway (it will eventually wrap around the top of the bookcases) but I took down other stuff as well. I want to redo ALL of it.
Covering an area of over 200 square kilometers Salinas Grandes (big salt flats) is vast. It is located at about 3,350m above sea level in the north west of Argentina.
Album: 21
Hey, could you recommend some not irritating vampire movies or books? I think Vampires are my favorite mythical creatures - you know: pale white, ice cold skin, fangs, stopping in time, mysterious personality, aristocrat clothing etc. But unfortunately everything I've watched or read about them was so painfully stupid and tiring, haha. Never mind. When I saw this vampire-lips printed top, I already knew that it must be mine ♥ Hmm, now I'm thinking about it, and PARDON ME, I forgot about
- Morcilla & Ricotta Flatbread
"But then, Moench also wrote a crazy homophobic Moon Knight story for Marvel Spotlight in the 70s, where Moon Knight takes sadistic pleasure in beating the shit out of a, to use Moon Knight's own terms, a 'tinkerbell,' 'pansy,' and 'twinkle-toes.'"
1). If you have children, using candy can be a great introduction to the world of art and creativity. While learning their colors and understanding patterns your children are learning how to express themselves creatively and artistically.
Life is always a work in progress.
What, in fact was shown up was the establishment's gut rotting terror that the public might hear the BNP's true message and realise that they are not the knuckle dragging monsters which the New Order demagogues have spent much of the last two decade's painting them.
But for now, Michael Koryta stares down the barrel of 9mm...
from womb
Hold on girl, your engine driver's coming,
Each vacation rental homes and condos. If you like and you will enjoy a foreign country with all the disney vacation packages canadian and how the discounted disney vacation packages will also meet local people because the discounted disney vacation packages in these outdoor activities at your rental and reservations for your to use. You should never give away your personal information or bank account access if you happen to be too stuffy or not as personalized or homey as you would like a real vacation.
In all God’s wisdom, I did not get the position at the other church. I praised Him.
DISC THREE: S.F. State U Acid Test (pt. 2)/Graduation Jam
Here's the previously-mentioned Unsolved Mysteries segment in its entirety. Warning: the audio is utter shit (turn it up).
Well thats my week what have you been up to?
Mr. vG came home in the middle of my project and was quite impressed with my layout of knobs. But of course, had something to say. He thought that the primer was a good step to ensure a better adhersion of the paint, however, if you want to take it one step further, he suggests sanding lightly with a ultra high grade sanding paper, one that won't leave scratch marks and then priming and painting. Urgh. Well, I quit at my six knobs then...only 32 more to go tomorrow when I pick up some sand paper. So many knobs...
4 cups chicken broth
I believe in Jesus Christ, his only Son, our Lord, who was born of a woman, suffered under Pontius Pilate, was crucified, died and was buried; on the third day he rose again from the dead; he ascended into heaven, and is seated at the right hand of God the Father almighty; from there he will come to judge the living and the dead.
Here, in what has become a classic of its kind since its publication in 1978, is the fascinating story of Jack Kerouac, “King of the Beats” and American literary legend, recorded through the voices of his friends and lovers.
You will need all of the supplies listed above, as well as the notably missing iron, thread, scissors, and sewing machine. The 'wallpaper' fabric, or base fabric, for the rooms needs to be at least a whole fat quarter (depending on the size of your suitcase), but the remaining fabric can be scraps - it's a great way to use up some of your stash.
I spent a few days in Shrewsbury recently. It has honoured its famous local Charles Darwin by "public art". But does it succeed in its purpose? One known as Quantum Leap is dissociated meaning as the form is not directly linked to the subject so there is no representation. The title Quantum Leap actually refers to something in physics not evolutionary biology which was Darwin's study. It is probably the contemporary informal term for making a major leap forward but applied to something celebrating Darwin confuses rather than elucidates. These contemporary artefacts arouse no curiosity and one does not feel inclined to enquire about them. They cannot be taken seriously as there is no spirit of genius behind them; rather, a commercial motive which are part of contemporary popular fashion and do not gain gravity from tradition. Quantum Leap looks like an armadillo crossed with a pack of cards and seems to be influenced by popular film Jurrasic Park rather than Darwin.
Yes! Kellie had Carli (shown below), Nicole had twin girls, and a TON of my friends are pregnant (two with twins!). And Erin gave birth to Tommy on the stairs in her house, which I'm mentioning because if you haven't read about it before, you really should now, it's hilarious and amazing! And I can't believe I live 3000 miles away from this baby, isn't she adorable? Miss you, Kel, and I can't wait to meet Carli!
“It criticizes the bad posts. We accept advices at a reasonable level but all the harsh posts using an ‘anonymous mask’ must disappear. We still couldn’t see the ‘Internet bullying’. We go to see from time to time when we have spare time but I think that fans are still treating us cutely.”(Kai)
birds leap
A place for you to help an abused senior. Get help, report, or just ask questions about abuse and our elderly. You can save a life! Make that call.
Today was our real anniversary date and we didn't do anything too special. We took a scenic route home, went for a jog, relaxed and I made spaghetti for dinner. Good times.
such questions, not of justice
I love this omission. It gives me something to wonder about.
That’s why loyal customers will often give you the benefit of the doubt on the rare occasion that your business fails to live up to what they have come to expect, based on the first impression of your business and each subsequent interaction which has strengthened it.
Or perhaps this is as good as it gets. So I just have to deal with it.
now wander in, dead brother.
Well, hell if I know. In the pool at least, I am just not that person anymore. It makes me wonder what else about me is changing. (I'll take change. Pretty much everything about me is material for revision).
Renters also need to spend an option fee after which a lease high quality. The choice charge is really a arranged amount the renter pays the seller. In the event that, at the end of the actual lease time period, the particular tenant buys the house, the choice charge gets area of the deposit. If the tenant does not purchase the home, the option charge becomes earnings for that vendor. Lease rates are a sum slightly over the common rent, using a part of that money heading toward a payment in advance.
2. Religion plays a vital role in the story. What is your opinion about the role of religion under the Lord Ruler? What do you think of Sazed’s role as a Keeper.
The first part of the project was to find a location. Disney hired the Stanford Research Institute to find an appropriate location that consisted of at least 100-acres, was located near Los Angeles, and could be reached by a freeway. The company found for Disney a 160-acre orange orchard in Anaheim, California.
Following are excerpts from addresses by Islamic scholar Sheik Yousuf Al-Qaradhawi, which aired on Al-Hiwar TV on February 15, 2008 and on Al-Jazeera TV on February 18, 2008.
I know this outfit isn't much of an inspiration as it has nothing to do with Spring but when it's cold & gloomy outside, I just don't feel like wearing bright or light colors. My outfit & post is as depressing as the weather. I don't even know why I'm publishing this.
Cry No More was a stellar book and one that needs to be read. This will not be the last book I will read from Linda Howard.
Scott D. Bart, 28, Malverne, N.Y.
I want to be free to be truly Myself, in my own creative and loving way. Knowledge of the Good may aid me in this, learning what others have found good and seeking in that what I find beautiful. The Archbishop of Canterbury summarises Robert and Edward Skidelsky in Prospect:
Yeah, when I found Mister Porter’s shotgun in the basement, if it wasn’t for that rusted old shotgun Grandma Olivia and me would both be dead. I would’ve preferred finding some shells for the Browning ‘cause a rifle’s a lot more accurate than a shotgun, but luckily things worked out okay anyway.
Pour this marinade over the dried chicken wings and mix well, coating them as much as possible.
after good faith negotiations have failed, provided that a potential licensee (a) makes
1. Adding a Face and Voice with Video. By replacing a cover letter with a quick video pitch, job seekers can showcase skills and abilities lost in translation in a traditional resume. As Bruce Hurwitz of Hurwitz Strategic Staffing says, “Video can increase my confidence in a candidate’s ability to successfully interview–Is she professional? Is she articulate?–or eliminate a candidate from consideration.” Of course, time is money, and candidates need to give recruiters a reason to keep watching. My advice: personality is great, but don’t get too cute. Balance is key.
There is a fire, burning deep inside
Not with the rice. I just had the egg part and broke it into little pieces which fit through as well.
Naturally I said yes. I'm thinking about asking for a big scoop of sand in exchange.
Later we’ll piss about backstage and drink Knob Creek.
Hello Love My Tapes friends! Hope you are having a great day. Love My tapes has some exciting news!! New fabric tapes Value packs has been added to the store, you can get them HERE.
Me: For crying out loud.
Being part of a community like this one allows us to learn about many things that we would otherwise probably never encounter in our lives. One of those things for me has been learning about something called Prader-Willi Syndrome. One of the lovely mamas on our board gave birth to a little girl named Lillian, who after much testing and waiting was diagnosed with PWS. With the help of her parents she is doing amazingly well. However, there is not yet a cure for PWS. 8 month old Lillian is given daily injections of growth hormones and will struggle throughout her life with insatiable hunger.
Lisbeth Kirk, Editor, EUobserver.com (Belgium) – Moderator
It's a nice day.
What we're seeing now is that myth beginning to unravel. The type of rhetoric liberals have been indulging in the past ten years, the barely-controlled personal attacks and open menacing of every last individual who opposes them -- Bush, Rove, Cheney, Rice, Palin, and Bachmann -- serves as its own fuel. The more it's repeated, the more incendiary it grows, the more it spreads, and the more used to it people become. It's like a narcotic that you grow habituated to -- every time you hit up, you need a bigger jolt. Eventually the threats become so lurid, so wild-eyed, that they begin to take on a life of their own. They become the standard means of expression. And at some definite but unknowable point, they begin to fulfill themselves. Some of your comrades, the more stupid, the more unbalanced, the more fanatical, begin taking them seriously, and start acting them out.
I was mortified at the idea I had embarrassed her.
The lovely best friend told her that betraying her dreams rooted from the fact that she felt pushed to obey all things. She was feeling obliged to do this and that, while those were only choices. “Life is all about choices, my dear” the best friend told her.
There were so many other great things to consider when building a great character, so many more details Steven James imparted. I wish I could list them here for you. If you ever get a chance to hear him speak, I highly recommend you make every effort. If not, get his books. I plan to get them because I’m sure there is much more I can use than what I learned at the conference.
—Ernst Rudolf Huber, official spokesman for the National Socialist German Workers’ Party, 1939
"The question in every case is whether the words used are used in such circumstances and are of such a nature as to create a clear and present danger that they will bring about the substantive evils that Congress has a right to prevent."
Clear Stamp Case
Cardstock: Recollections, The Paper Company
No wonder my stats and stuff are in the It can.
This year's events are mindblowing and sure to inspire you on your Unschooling path! Join us for the 2nd annual Life Rocks! Conference.
Fly because it releases my mind from the tyranny of petty things. __Antoine de Saint-Exupery
The last time this workout popped up was in 2004. The vast majority of crossfitters have never touched this workout (unless it was self-designed, or they took the time to try archived workouts). If you like to do fundamental strength work before workouts, I would include something like a 3×3 or 3×5 snatch at 70-80% 1 RM. This is also a workout where the final time is NOT hugely important (in my opinion). Killing the 400m sprints and being diligent in your technique on the TGU’s would be my priorities.
Then get dual nationality, such as I have,
If you are joining in on Show and Tell Friday, please remember that your Show and Tell needs to be something from your home or garden. Please read the Show and Tell Guidelines for step-by-step instructions on how to participate. If you would like to join in, please enter your name and leave your exact Show and Tell blog post link, not just your blog link and as a common courtesy link back to my blog. If your link has been removed, please re-read over the guidelines before re-posting, or e-mail me with any questions.
8. What do you notice that I do when I am feeling uncomfortable or nervous?
Willow was very brave as Dr. Schaeffer drew blood for the panel and obtained a sterile urine sample. To Dr. Schaeffer’s surprise, Willow had a significant urinary tract infection or UTI. On the urinalysis, she found a high number of white blood cells and red bacteria – evidence of an infection, even though Willow was not showing any outward signs of the infection at home. On the bright side, Willow’s blood panel showed that her hyperthyroidism continues to be well-managed with medication and no new problems were detected.
Dinner - Salisbury steak, garlic mashed potatoes, green beans with bacon
One day a construction worker left the job a little early, and when he got home he found his wife in bed with another man. Purple with rage, he hauled the man down the stairs and into the garage where he proceeded to secure his dick in a vice.
Of all the coverage of the 100th anniversary of the Titanic disaster, has anyone thought about the dogs? Read what happened to the dozen canines aboard the ship when it sank.
It would seem that I am supposed to base my decision on 1 sheet of glossy paper each. Now, I have become more politically interested over the past few years, so do seek out information. It is still all a new field to me though, and what comes in to my letterbox is still very important. For those less politically interested, this is the ONLY information they are going to get on which to base their decision. Again, I would like to point out that WE are CHOOSING someone to represent US. Now that should be a huge decision, yet most people can not even be bothered to vote, for those that do, like I said it’s based on 4 glossy sheets of paper.
The Minister of Social Development has said she wants to privatise welfare by making workers set up their own social insurance schemes. She says that work is good for beneficiaries health. Perhaps she has rediscovered that work makes you free. She has created a task force to cut welfare which includes rightwingnuts and private contractors to welfare services. We can see where this is headed with the funding of Whanau Ora to farm out welfare services for Maori to private contractors, and the $5 million contracted to the Pacific Economic Development Agency run by National Party cronies.
I was pretty much speechless after watching Lost in Austen with a friend of mine; we ended up watching Saturday Night Live, well, live as we recovered. Lost in Austen is unique in that it’s the first Mary Sue Self Insert Fic television miniseries I’ve ever seen and will possibly ever see. (Kiss your productivity goodbye!) It was one of the most surreal experiences of my life, to be totally honest—since Mary Sue Self Insert Fics are an important rite of passage in the lives of preteen fangirls, it felt like reading some (remarkably literary) thirteen year old’s diary. It’s… something to be experienced.
So where’s the problem?
put all the dry ingredients in a bowl including the chopped fruit, mash up the bananas in a separate bowl and warm the oil and honey up on the cooker - not too hot.
It’s from the Los Angeles Herald from 1985 and has some great cycling tips like:
Lesson 1: practice changing tires/flats since as I clydesdale I can expect to have a few flats during training and possibly races.
Best piece of writing advice you've ever received: You make yourself a writer. No one else can, or will, do it for you. A creative writing instructor at Creighton University told me that and I'm ashamed to admit that I don't remember which one. But it's true.
Does that mean that the first book should not be published? Sadly, the answer is that these days it usually won’t be – because it won’t (defined by target sales) ‘work’ for the publisher. Yet authors (and editors) who have contact with youngsters in reading groups at school and library know that readers of book A exist: they’re borrowers not necessarily buyers – an impossible conundrum for publishers facing a library and school sector turning away from investment in books. Yet the readers are there and, if given access to forums or to authors, will discuss books enthusiastically and intelligently, reflecting their hunger for them.
So what is my next step? Let me borrow a quote from Bruce Lee:
Really, this sounds like one huge, bad decision.
By my estimates, I should have close to 350,000 words done on the book…not the original 430,000 word count deadline I imposed on myself so loftily late last month and on Twitter.
so why do we make out like it's perfect? guys. we all have days where we look awful. where we feel awful. where people are being horrid. where we're being horrid. where we just tripped over nothing. where we spilled coffee down our chin. where we can't afford those 'blogger' coloured jeans, oxfords, nikon, nerd glasses, blazer, starbucks coffee in our hand every two seconds, or iphone.
The ones I don't like in the least are 1986, 1991, 1992 and 1996. I think I've mentioned before that 1986 horrified me from the moment I saw it and prevented me from buying any of it. I know I've mentioned before that if Fisher Price were to make card sets, they would look like 1991 Donruss. And, of course, 1992 Donruss is vile and nauseating, and 1996 has the most ridiculous logo placement ever.
Fueling the American spirit!
With today’s rain receding I managed to get my shallots out this afternoon. A few sets of Hative de Niort and Jermor went in next to the overwintered onions. And some onion sets left over from those I planted out at the shared plot which I filled any gaps with.
Lawmakers laid claim to estimates that Dodd-Frank will obligate private-sector businesses to spend close to 25 million hours every year to comply with the first 185 rules.
Yes, THAT Hugh Laurie. Actor. Comedy partner of Stephen Fry. Dr. House.
Then we spent Sunday showing Owen the sights in DC. And take a guess at what he was most impressed with... the Capitol? No. ... the new Martin Luther King, Jr. memorial? No. ... the Washington Monument? Nope. He couldn't believe the amazing "pretzel and t-shirt carts"!!! Ha - you never know what a six-year old is going to find entertaining! (If you check back tomorrow, I should have the photos of our DC outing up here.)
Date: 9 February 2012
Isn’t there a presidential manual somewhere that they could upload onto the teleprompter or download into your ipod?
We had to take turns after that. The idiot was still there with his dogs. So when I went down I screamed the whole way to get the dumbass to move, but he never did. That F-er. My third attempt was the best one, and amazingly enough, that's the one when we got video.
…so you came from the east right?”
- Discussion of market dynamics and key trends, plus market opportunities and threats;
For a chance to hang out with President Obama at George Clooney's house, donate $3 or whatever you can to be automatically entered to win.
Thank you wonderful CLP players for all the entries last month.
Moles.
It's that young boy I look for in the playground- the playground that is still there despite the fact you need a key to get in now. Why?
The “Working here” part of the “World of Manchester” site gives some very brief info on the main types of employment. However, if you want more detail (and for those areas you want to seriously consider, we realise you will want more than this overview), just click the “Finding work” link at the top of the interactive map .
Before I make you chase me to where I really am, let me explain why all the guest posts and interviews in a row, lol.
Bring to the boil and turn it down to a simmer.
2010, you revealed my weaknesses by slapping me in the face. Very public failures that led to sleepless nights that led to wildly aggressive, mildly productive days that led to more sleepless nights that somehow led me to a logical idea of how to proceed in the most efficient way. You took my dangerous overconfidence and stripped it down to it's core; an inflated ego resting on a wobbly scaffolding made up of too many compliments, too few challenges, and the idea that I could do anything, at any time. 2010, at a certain point you were beating me down in such a brutal way that you made me feel deeply connected to the world around me. Turmoil, frailty, unrest, rage. You forced me to find a way to escape myself if only through running until my legs cramped and my lungs ached, and I was far, far away, with no choice but to walk back home alone, insecurities and fears taunting me the whole way.
So anyhow, I use to be an organizer of a moms group here in this great city I call HELL Paso, so I have a binder of activities I could do and share with her to help her out with ideas. I am in NO way making a promise or new years resolution to do a new one everyday with my son, but he can definitely benefit from some educational and fun activities with his Mama once in a while too!
The owner of a newspaper I write for was sponsoring this event, so I figured I ought to check it out. To say I was reluctant to do this is an understatement. The first thing I usually consider is “Am I going to be the oldest one there?” I’ve been considering this for a couple of years now. Sometimes it’s true.
But back to the subject at hand. The networking event for professionals in publishing — the one that I had invested so much hope in, the one that was supposed to be my coming-out event — didn’t happen. Whatever planet rules work-life balance must have been in retrograde last Thursday, because I was even more inundated with work than usual. I find it a little bizarre that this happened on such a special night for me, but perhaps it wasn’t bizarre at all. Either way, I worked through all of my meals, until my head hurt and I couldn’t see my computer screen anymore.
I am giving away one copy of Surface Treatment Workshop. To be eligible to win, all you need to do is leave a comment on this post by Friday 4/15. The winner will be on announced on my Facebook page on Saturday 4/16. Please be sure I have your email so I can contact the winner directly. Good luck!
Unlike the Denver Nuggets, the Golden State Warriors are continuing off from their last season success with an explosive beginning to the 2005 season.
We went on a little safari today to Mikuni National Park. We saw all sorts of animals (but no lions or hyenas, mostly grazers), and it was all very exciting and I promise I will blog more and load pictures.
Thanks for stopping by! I hope your holiday planning is going well. I don't even have a tree yet or any decorations yet. We'll get there! Having our football season go 15 weeks has really put me behind.
- i've recently started zumba where i'm learning to shake what my momma gave me and sculpt rock hard abs. at least, that's what my gay instructor tells me. and i believe him because i've seen him shake what his momma gave him and he has rock hard abs.
‘I’m not gonna do the same stuff again, because if I did I’d be bored shitless,’ Björk chuckles. ‘I’m only halfway through. I try and talk myself into it sometimes, and the most sensible thing would be to do more of this again because I know I’d do it better because I wasn’t doing it for the first time and people get it now. I can hold my breath and do that for a couple of days and then I go: “Fuck that shit”. It would just feel like cheating. My attention span is rubbish, so I get bored very easily and it just isn’t any good because my heart isn’t in it.’
And then there is the out of control GERD, which caused her to choke and stop breathing many times in her first month of life, necessitating a trip to the ER and a stay at Children’s Hospital. This means that she has never been able to lie flat on the ground, meaning we still have to carry her constantly or keep her upright somehow. She also sleeps in a special bed that’s a foam wedge to keep her upright.
I was thrilled to play a small part in setting the ambiance for this lovely ceremony.
Still, they’re very well-ventilated and also comfy. They’re a nice compromise for going through monsoon areas without looking like a German backpacker.
And what about these taste temptations?
Nito chargers and napkin rings - World Market
Emmerdale: Jackson’s choice - WINNER
Trying to lose what you’ve found.
This is one of those people I know better from my keyboard
A few names:
Jesus; have the mindset of a victor. The Bible lets us know that we are
Can the human race solve its own problems? We have about 6,000 years of experience and there is but one thing we learn from history; and what is that? We do not learn anything from history.
My mother-in-law Sandi has always been an amazing seamstress. When she retired, she took up quilting as a new hobby. She became an awesome quilter surprisingly fast, and her beautiful quilts really changed my impression of quilts and quilting. She has a great sense of color and contrast, and made me realize that quilts could be traditional or modern, classic or trendy, or anything else you can dream up! We've been the lucky recipient of many a beautiful gifted quilt over the past few years (you might remember the Christmas quilt shown in this post). I still need to get proper photos of the new one on our bed, but I thought I'd share photos of another recent quilt she made.
* Carnegie Mellon University - Pittsburgh (USA)
I’m single. I’ve said that numerous times since starting this blog, and I have no problem letting people know that. But know that I say single as my marital status. No one has put a ring on my finger. I have not applied for a marriage license or booked a reception hall.
In the Edinburgh ward where our party leader stood as a candidate, we achieved 30 votes! This is a increase of 25 votes on our Scottish Elections campaign last year and 28 votes more than what the Monkey Party achieved in the 2010 General Elections.
This interview with Manyi was broadcast on KykNet's Robinson Regstreeks in March 2010 while he was still the director-general of labour.
Suppose Lim Kit Siang, Tok Guru or DSAI blurted such cries in their assemblies, what would BN have done? Surely by now these veterans would be castrated in Kamunting, right?
1/8 teaspoons Habenero chile powder
from 1966...
“We get drunk with power and leaders think this chair belongs to me, the ANC belongs to the masses,” said Mabuza.
Lindsay Lohan may be a trainwreck now, but in 2004 she was at her celebrity apex. She had developed from precocious kid actor to spunky pre-teen to I-feel-guilty-for-thinking-this-girl-is-hot teenager into a full-bore star.
3) A passage from a music essay:
Today’s run was similarly moist, although it was a bit warmer today. We kept it short at 4 miles, but had a brisk pace of about 7:45 for much of the run. The plan is to run again tomorrow and then take Friday off before a longer run on Saturday.
This precious name at the gateway makes the approach easy.
Earlier in the semester, I prepared some homemade chicken broth and have kept it in the freezer. There's no comparison between boxed and canned chicken broth! You can't get the same silkiness in boxed broth. To make the broth I basically build up a stock of chicken bones from roasted chickens and less-than-attractive vegetables (carrots, celery, parsley, and onion) and freeze them. Once I get several quart bags of bones and vegetables, I add them to my two stock pots, cover the ingredients with water, and sometimes supplement the ingredients with more fresh vegetables. I season with sage, thyme, parsley, and bay leaves and allow the mixture to simmer for at least an hour and a half. I allow the broth to cool to room temperature then strain it and cool it completely in the refrigerator. I scrape any residual fat off the top to make the broth nearly fat-free. It's so wonderful to have on hand. One other thing I should note is that broth does not keep long in the refrigerator and you also need to be very careful to cool it completely before refrigeration because it can sour easily. If you can't use it within a couple of days, freeze it.
Grace, love, and the salvation of God in Christ Jesus is with us always, and is always the same yesterday, today and forever. It is from everlasting to everlasting. These blessings flow from the goodness and mercy of God, and not from our own merit, or by anything of which we can boast. We are the recipients of His great mercy and loving kindness given freely to us. We must always be cognizant to seek first the kingdom of God and his righteousness given to us on Calvary. We receive the love of God freely that He provides to us, His children. When we are down, broken, rebellious, undeserving, and even spiteful His grace is sufficient heal our hearts, forgive our sins, and supply all our needs.
"I'd like chicken soup with matzo balls and gefilte soup," Tom said judiciously.
06. Sunrise (Original Vocal Mix by Miguel Migs) - Roomsa / 5:04
How does Adsense work?
Rick Santorum is no longer in the running for President. Of course, by now, you already knew that. I realized, while writing the post analyzing the rise and fall of Dickface McAssjuice (come on, I missed the whole campaign; let me have this one), that this has been done to death by now.
vegetable stock – 1 1/2 cup
Sketch Club non-commitment: $27 (plus $7 flat rate shipping, United States)
Hmmm. That didn’t really work.
My breasts are tender from the cold. My body shivers. I feel something. My body goes almost limp. My heart palpitates, my breathing becomes swifter. Is someone there?
What Creative Time Says: At home as well as in the world, some of the best rooms are not for the guests.
As you can tell I’m not that happy about the whole thing, but I suppose it’s better than having none of my writing published at all. It’s bad enough that my last poem to be published in an anthology got printed with a typo that changed the whole meaning of that particular line, but in my eyes this is even worse. I just wish they could have thought of me highly enough to be able to make edits to my own writing myself.
Schmitt sees the political moment increasingly dissolved not just by the unending conversation of liberalism, but also by valorization of technical-economic administration. (65)
DV8′s new piece definitely talks. It moves as Lloyd Newson’s company does so well, but the talking is key to this spectacularly powerful and discursive piece of theatre. The play opens with a man asking the audience how many of them feel morally superior to the Taliban. Only 10% of people on the night I went put their hands up. The actor then begins to list some of the things the Taliban have done. People shift uneasily. That is what this show does, it pushes boundaries and it talks about something that I personally feel people are too scared to talk about.
And that's not the only thing I forgot. I was scheduled to bring snacks to our MOPs children's workers last week. Did they get a snack? No. Did I forget? I did. Did I even remember I forgot? Nope. Not until yesterday's steering team meeting when someone brought up that they didn't have a snack. My face went quite pale I assume. No, they didn't have a snack because I forgot!
The Maya organizations and people who daily struggle for justice have received threats and intimidation, and risk their lives and their freedom in the general indifference of the world.
my baby sister would take me to the gym and work out with me to strengthen my weak legs
While browsing at many tile stores, I have seen various versions of the herringbone pattern, but nothing exactly like this. The color and beautiful texture is exactly what was missing from my kitchen. So on a late Saturday afternoon, hours and hours into my quest to find the perfect herringbone, I found long limestone strips that are usually used for exteriors and decided to buy a 1 sq ft sample.
Sadly, too many times even my clients are overwhelmed by the uninformed public sentiment of information is free, expertise is not necessary to validate and what is printed with ink and bytes must be true and factual… it is sometimes a very sad state of affairs. In most of these cases this uninformed mass does noting to solve the problem they just derail the reality of focusing on the possible solutions.
But I couldn't resist this ray of sunshone on the rails at H & M.
“Taseko Mines Ltd. is pushing the Harper government to reconsider a controversial gold-copper mining project in the B.C. interior. A Vancouver company pushing the Harper government to reconsider a controversial gold-copper mining project in the B.C. interior has privately urged Ottawa to ignore aboriginal requests to consider native “spirituality” as a factor in their determination, according to a letter the company sent to Environment Minister Peter Kent. A new federal environmental review panel “does not have any right to attribute significance to the spirituality of a place per se,” wrote Taseko Mines Ltd. President Russell Hallbauer in a letter obtained under the Access to Information Act and provided to The Vancouver Sun by B.C. independent MLA Bob Simpson.
To complete my personal dream picture, it turns out I'd moved down to Los Angeles myself not too many years before along with a Betty/Diane actress/girlfriend who had been lured by Hollywood's dangerous siren call of fame and fortune. She was gone by the time the movie came out, but I don't know if she wound up crashing on the rocks like Lynch's blonde heroine. If she did, it didn't make the papers. After she left though, I found myself on many a night afterward navigating the sharp corners of Mulholland Dr., thrilling at the old road's sloping curves while soaking in the history and the dreams and trying to forget.
From a practical point of view Unwin recommends running rods along natural hollows rather than across them to aid natural drainage.
